In my opinion, the literature program was shaped by women of a certain age, based on their interests.
We preferred Danilevsky and Volkonsky from Russian literature of the 19th century.
They wrote fiction, of course, from the point of view of the very young ladies of Balzac's age.
And the psychology and torment of the heroines of Tolstoy and Turgenev are not so interesting for teenagers.
Teenagers are rarely interested in the psychology of the characters.
Thank you very much, it was very interesting.
Perhaps the roses were stuffed to look like a certain variety?
There are roses of this colour and with this structure of petals, which look like velvet, as a rule, dark-red or burgundy.
And the white roses look different, the petals have a silk or satin sheen.
Sharks attack surfers, mistaking them for sea turtles...
Bulls are apparently color-blind.
Bears eat garbage...
Gorillas are not to be looked in the eye - in some safari parks visitors are given goggles with eyes drawn on to prevent this.
Bees still orient themselves by scent...
The mattress Promtex Micropacket Prestige 105x195.
The model “Micropack Prestige”: comfort and natural composition.
The mattress has different firmness on the sides: the middle-firm surface is made of latticed coconut fiber and natural latex, and the moderately soft surface is made of natural latex.
The spring block with 1000 springs per square metre adapts quickly to the shape of the sleeper, warning of the "wave" or "hammock" effect.
Among the advantages of the model, it is necessary to highlight the breathable materials.
The breathable, perforated latex is naturally ventilated just like coconut coir.
This maintains a healthy microclimate in the sleeping area.
The mattress also comes with an extended warranty.
The manufacturer's official warranty period is 5 years, in practice the mattress's service life is longer.
Dust and dirt protection is provided by a removable Jacquard cover supplied with the set.
Buy a pair of orthopedic pillows to go with the mattress - they are recommended for keeping the spine in an optimal position during sleep.
The filler determines the purpose of the sides - coconuts serve as anatomical support for the back, latex relaxes the muscles.
Get the brain working and go after those relatives!
Better to have none than such...
Or you're looking for a driver, or someone who's willing to invest and work with you in a partnership.
If not, then sell the car, even though you'll lose money, don't regret it.
Next time, you will think better...
Andrey, you have been clearly explained that pensioners work in schools, they will not work in a team.
The computer teacher won't be able to help either, he wasn't taught this, the school plays games in Windows.
So there is no support.
I shudder to think of those parties and guests at my parents' house.
The guests are at the door, and on the stove there are still the Duke's pastries being fried, and the mother is lying on the floor.
Lord, he's already fallen off the table.
And then, after that, you have to wash the dishes, and then you have to clean the house.
A week before the holiday, you carry the groceries, two days cleaning, one day cleaning up after.
And the guests?
They're good, and they'll always have a cake with them.
That's why I don't like holidays and guests.
Even for my family, I cover the table with a tablecloth.
And I make the ice cream myself, I bake it very often just like that.
Germany: Fourth coronavirus vaccine inevitable
A fourth vaccine would be needed in the summer or fall of 2022.
According to the expert, the current vaccination in Germany will not be the final one, but will continue with new strength.
Despite an active vaccination campaign in Germany, two or three doses of the coronavirus vaccine are probably not enough to provide full protection.
The head of the Association of General Practitioners, Ulrich Weigelt, is convinced of this.
This is reported by Die Welt on Saturday, 11 December.
"We expect that the fourth vaccination will be required in the summer, at the latest in autumn," the expert believes.
In addition, Wiegandt hopes that a fourth coronavirus vaccine can be given "in combination with a flu vaccine."
This will help to achieve the best results.
In addition, enhanced vaccination may help in the fight against the spread of the new coronavirus strain "Omicron".
And the new version is particularly dangerous.
The likelihood of reinfection with Omicron is three times higher than that of Delta or Beta strains.
This is supported by preliminary findings from South Africa.
Based on this, BioNTech/Pfizer plan to provide an Omikron-adapted vaccine by March 2022.
The companies stressed that two doses of the vaccine do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the new variant of the coronavirus "Omicron".
BioNTech and Pfizer's study showed that with two doses of the vaccine, effectiveness was significantly lower: "neutralizing potential is reduced more than 25-fold."
"This suggests that two doses of BNT162b2 do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the Omicron strain," BioNTech and Pfizer said.
Therefore, a third dose is required.
Experts are urging the country to speed up its vaccination drive.
For example, the president of the German Society of Infectious Diseases, Bernd Salzberger, advocates reducing the interval between the second and third vaccinations.
Moreover, as Zalcberg believes, accelerated vaccination will have an impact on the spread of both the delta and omicron variants of the coronavirus.
“Israel’s experience is very convincing in this regard”, the expert stressed.
Wobler Pontoon21, Bet-A Vib, 54 Silent, 54 mm, 8.5 g.
The Bet-A-Vib series is a special line of the Bet-A family from Pontoon21®.
It (and the Kalikana Vib series) differs from many other vibes in that it was originally designed for ice fishing, not just for trolling.
These lenses have a greater weight than their close-in counterparts, which, without a doubt, has a positive impact on the nuances of using these interesting lures.
Another distinctive feature is the top flap made of rigid and elastic plastic, which creates additional vibration tones during vertical and horizontal wiring.
As a "winter vibe," Bet-A-Vib demonstrates quite aggressive play when fishing in the drop.
Often the most effective is a simple monotonous animation, i.e. the lure moving up and down almost without pauses.
The deviation from the vertical axis is not very great, which is convenient when fishing in a confined space, cluttered with underwater vegetation, rocks and other obstacles, where it is possible to get a hold.
In addition, a slight deviation is relevant when fishing for pike and large perch in winter, and especially in mid-winter, when a precise and aggressive presentation of the bait is required.
Reaching the extreme point of its trajectory, Bet-A-Vib instantly unfolds and returns to its original vertical.
Bet-A-Vib is also very effective for ice fishing for perch.
To suit her whims, you can choose between two modifications: with a noise-cancelling capsule (NS – NanoSound) or without it (SL – Silent).
It was also noted that the Bet-A-Vib vibrator can stimulate a passive fish, even one that doesn't react to a live fish.
The Bet-A-Vib demonstrates distance and accuracy in the catch.
This buckle is easy to tie and doesn't chafe, and it works well with leather and braided cord even with large diameters.
For catching perch, roach, rudd or gudgeon, the "step" is also effective, sometimes with "scratching" on the bottom.
If you're fishing in weedy areas, you can change the front treble to a double, which will reduce the chances of getting snagged.
Among its class, Bet-A-Vib is one of the most stable and, as a result, one of the most easily caught.
It can be used with equal success on relatively shallow and fairly deep areas.
All models are equipped with Owner ST-36 hooks.
How many young slackers are sitting on the necks of their elderly parents.
The "golden youth" are clearly the laziest bunch of people you'll ever meet, who know nothing and can't do anything.
A life of ease leads to laziness.
Perhaps Mishustin was referring to this large part of the population.
You are, of course, kidding.
She's never seen a pair of shoes in that store that she wanted to buy.
What about the long-term contract?
The shoes are made of leather.
Well, if one season lasts, that's good.
"Zenden" is on the same level as "Kari".
Go in, look around, and figure out what to do with them.
Libya says it has 7,000 Russian mercenaries
More than 7,000 mercenaries from a private military company (PMC) Wagner are stationed in Libya.
This was stated by the Chairman of the High State Council of the Republic, Khaled al-Mishri, on Sunday, December 12.
Currently, there are more than 7,000 Wagner mercenaries in Libya.
They also have planes.
They are also digging trenches in Sirte and Kufra.
They have 30 jet fighters at airbases in Ghardaia (also used as a civilian airport in Sirte)," Anadolu Agency quotes him as saying.
Khaled al-Mishri also noted that Russian mercenaries "are trying to seize" the central part of Libya, stretching from Chad to the Mediterranean Sea, after "bringing their man to power" in the Central African Republic.
Maintain presence
According to the publication's source, Moscow was looking for a country to maintain its presence in North Africa and "settled in Libya."
"Wagner" has been in Libya since 2019, using an airbase and port in Sirte as well as an airbase in Jufra, the agency notes.
Russian authorities officially deny that the Wagner Group is supported by the Kremlin.
Where else can mercenaries be found?
According to the agency, Wagner is active in nine African countries - the Central African Republic, Libya, Sudan, Mozambique, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Madagascar, Zimbabwe and Angola.
The company provides military training to local forces, personal security for leaders, and protection of energy facilities.
In exchange for these services, Wagner's subsidiaries receive certain privileges and licenses to extract minerals and natural resources, as well as to supply weapons, technologies, and military services to these countries," the article says.
According to the media, the “Wagnerites” allegedly fought in the Donbass, Syria, Mozambique, Sudan and CAR.
The group is not listed in either the security services or the register of legal entities, and its fighters are not listed in the personnel roster.
The company is under US sanctions.
Recall that earlier, the ambassadors of 27 EU countries approved restrictions against “Wagner”.
The Council of the European Union is expected to approve this decision on 13 December.
The situation in Libya
The Supreme State Council of Libya is de facto the second chamber of parliament with advisory functions dominated by Islamists, writes TASS.
The body has repeatedly called for the single day of voting for the election of deputies of the parliament and the head of state to be moved from 24 December at least until February 2022.
"Less than two weeks remain until the elections, and the chances of them being held on time are rapidly diminishing," the material notes.
In the meantime, the High Election Commission of Libya has postponed indefinitely the announcement of the final list of candidates, reports the Sky News Arabia television channel.
Russia's foreign policy through the eyes of Russians
38% of Russians see the country's foreign policy as more successful than unsuccessful, 29% see it as unsuccessful.
"Success examples - "we defended and restored peace in Syria", "the decision on "Nord Stream 2"", "the whole world was scared that a heavy weapon", "we got Crimea back".
The main failures are “conflict with Ukraine”, “conflict with the West”, “isolation from the world”, the study by the Public Opinion Foundation says.
Dubai government has gone completely paperless - all government services are now digital
Dubai government has announced a complete shift from paper-based records to digital technology.
All public services to the population will also be provided exclusively in electronic form.
This was reported by the Emirati news agency WAM.
"Today marks the beginning of a new phase of digitisation of all aspects of life in Dubai - we have completed the transition to a fully digital government," said His Highness Sheikh Hamdan bin Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum, Crown Prince of Dubai and Chairman of the Executive Council of Dubai, in a statement on Saturday.
Now, internal and external document circulation in all government departments of Dubai will be carried out only in digital form through special information platforms.
The initiative has affected all sectors, including health, utilities, the police, municipal authorities, courts and so on. Many commercial entities have also joined the government initiative.
The move to an electronic government and digitization of document circulation began in Dubai in 2018.
In that time, the authorities say, 336 million sheets of paper have been saved, which is the equivalent of 14 million hours of human labour and $353.8 million in cash.
Previously, Moscow Mayor Sergey Sobyanin stated that electronic services save citizens 2 days per year.
Dana, well, about the date of birth and how old the child is, that's marzipan, about the class and group at the kindergarten too.
I don't believe that such stretches are possible.
And if they do happen, they clearly don't care, not even about the family.
My mother, her two brothers and grandfather and grandmother lived on the first floor of 3 Vladimirskaya, no railings.
They first knocked on the door, then on the window, then decided not to be polite and broke the window and got in, but grandpa had a baseball bat and they got it.
They knew there was someone at home.
Turkey's car production and exports fall below 2020 levels
Turkey's car production and exports fell sharply in November as the lira depreciated.
As a result, the industry's performance in the first 11 months was worse than last year, Bloomberg reports, citing data from the Turkish Automotive Manufacturers Association.
According to the association, in November 115,000 cars were released from the Turkish factories, which is 20% less than a year ago.
About 759,000 cars were exported, which is more than 25% less than last year.
And if in the first 10 months of this year, the automotive sector of Turkey demonstrated positive dynamics compared to the previous year, then in the 11 months of 2021, the production of cars was already 0.3% lower than the previous year.
The reason for this fall was the sharp depreciation of the Turkish lira, which in November lost 29% against the dollar.
This has led to a decline in economic activity across all sectors.
More than 500 SMEs received credit payment deferrals in 2021
Deputy Prime Minister Alihan Smailov spoke about the situation with the provision of benefits for small and medium-sized businesses, reports the Kazinform correspondent.
"According to the information of the Agency of the Republic of Kazakhstan for Regulation and Development of the Financial Market, in the current year, in accordance with the order of the Head of State of April 1, 2021 No. 127 "On the approval of the Order of the Head of the Agency of April 9, 2021 No. 127 "On the Approval of the Procedure for Granting a Deferral of Payments on Loans of Small and Medium-Sized Businesses", the Head of the Agency has approved the Procedure for Granting a Deferral of Payments on Loans of Small and Medium-Sized Businesses," Alihan Smailov wrote in his response to the deputy's request.
He recalled that the provision for loan rescheduling stipulated that banks and microfinance institutions providing microfinance services would provide loan rescheduling for loans issued prior to April 1, 2021 to MSMEs, including sole proprietors, from April 1 to June 30, 2021.
The deferral period was from 30 to 90 days, at the discretion of the subject of the MSB.
The borrower's statement may have specified a different period of deferral of payments.
During the deferral period, the claim-filing work, the notice of the need to pay the overdue debt, as well as the lender’s collection of commissions and other payments, were suspended," the deputy prime minister noted.
In 2021, second-tier banks received applications for deferral of payments on loans from 603 borrowers-subjects of MCBs, of which 553 borrowers-subjects of MCBs received deferral for a total of KZT 9.7 billion.
131 subjects of the MFO applied for deferment, of which 95 were granted deferment for a total of 105.8 million tenge," A. Smailov concluded.
Pulmonologist Puryev suggested that people with weak immunity can easily carry the "Okmiron" strain
The doctor suggested that people with weakened immune systems may be more likely to pass it on than those with a strong immune response
Pulmonologist Sergey Puryazev explained why the “Okmiron” strain of the coronavirus can be dangerous.
The cause lies in the conditions of the virus's emergence.
Scientists believe that the "occamiron" was born in the body of an HIV-infected or immune-compromised person.
So, in the case of a mutation, it didn't meet any resistance from the immune system.
This makes him more aggressive.
Because there was no immune response, it became very fast.
Apparently, there are these spike proteins, thorns, maybe more than necessary, their antibodies were not cut during the mutations, pulmonologist Sergey Puryasev comments.
The doctor suggested that people with weakened immune systems may be more susceptible to the "occamiron" than those with a strong immune response.
It turns out that a strong immune response to anything, any infection, is not always good.
In such cases, the body can kill itself.
This is what happens with pneumococcal infections, when 30-year-olds collapse and 60-year-olds die.
The immune response of the young is inadequate: where one could only scratch with a finger, it strikes like a cannonball at sparrows, concluded Sergei Puryashev.
The doctor also reminded that the coronavirus has dangerous side effects and the most unpleasant of them is pneumonia.
Pneumonia can be bacterial or viral.
If the first is treated very successfully and quickly, in the second case you can often only buy the symptoms - all hope for the body.
The first sign of developing pneumonia will be the onset of body intoxication - this is temperature, weakness, malaise.
Then come respiratory symptoms: difficulty breathing, a feeling of tightness in the throat, a cough.
Pain on one side or the other, as well as abdominal pain, can also be signs of a developing problem.
Meanwhile, in Russia, by the end of the year, it may begin to vaccinate the younger generation from 12 to 18 years old.
A virologist, head of the gene engineering laboratory at MFTI, Pavel Volchkov noted that this category is very actively affected by COVID-19.
The more contacts a teenager has, the more likely they are to go to school.
This is the most socially active stratum, just like kindergarten teachers, said Pavel Volkov, a virologist and head of the genomic engineering laboratory at the Moscow Institute of Physics and Technology (MIPT).
Huge thanks to the author for this article.
She was happy to refresh her memory...
Teath-In.
In those far-off seventies and eighties, no dance floor was without the music of this group.
And at home, when they gathered with friends, they would dance to their music.
Immunologists have proposed a hypothesis to explain why obesity makes people vulnerable to COVID-19
The authors studied the adipose tissue left over from bariatric surgery and found that the adipose cells, known as adipocytes, can be infected by the coronavirus.
Immune cells located in adipose tissue, macrophages, were also infected, and showed a strong inflammatory response.
Scientists also examined the fat tissue of patients who died from COVID-19 and found coronavirus particles in the fat surrounding various organs.
It is known that HIV and flu viruses can hide in fat tissue, using it as a reservoir to evade the immune system.
It is likely that SARS-CoV-2 can do this.
The biologist spoke about the causes of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semen Goloshaykin named the causes of dementia and told about the ways of its prevention in an interview with the radio station Sputnik.
According to the World Health Organization, this disease affects more than 55 million people.
The syndrome manifests itself in a gradual loss of cognitive functions - over time, a person finds it increasingly difficult to orient himself in familiar surroundings.
Goloshakin noted that the most common causes of dementia are neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, some infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
Some factors increase the risk of developing the disease.
This includes hypertension, diabetes, high cholesterol, obesity, depression and alcoholism.
At the behavioral level, there are possible factors such as social isolation and lack of active cognitive activity," he said.
Dementia is also affected by bad habits, such as smoking, excessive drinking, disrupted sleep patterns and a sedentary lifestyle.
Among the first signs of the disorder, the expert noted, were forgetfulness, inability to concentrate and a decline in abstract thinking.
"There is a discussion that hearing loss can be an early sign of Alzheimer's disease, or a risk factor for its development," the biologist added.
To prevent the development of the disease, the World Health Organization recommends maintaining a sufficient level of physical activity, training cognitive skills and abilities that require the use of memory and logic.
Previously, the professor of the Department of Neurology, Neurosurgery and Medical Genetics of the Russian Presidential Academy of National Economy and Public Administration.
N.I. Pirogov, the head of the department of cognitive disorders of the Federal Center of Brain and Neurotechnology Anna Bogolepova spoke about the causes of memory problems.
Egypt returns nearly 30,000 illegally exported artefacts
In the last 10 years, the government of Cairo has managed to repatriate more than 30,000 artifacts that were illegally smuggled out of the country.
This was announced on Saturday, 11 December, on Al-Hayat TV channel by the chief inspector of the Department of Returned Antiquities at the Ministry of Tourism and Antiquities of Egypt, Shaaban Abdel Gawad.
Since 2011, the Egyptian state has managed to recover 29,300 artefacts.
Only this year, the Bible Museum in Washington discovered 5300 ancient Egyptian artifacts," he said.
Abdel Gawad clarified that all the artifacts smuggled into the country are registered in the archives.
Officials in the department are now working to get them back to Egypt.
In particular, specialists "track auctions worldwide and sales on the Internet" through foreign and Egyptian sites, as well as social networks.
The chief inspector explained that cultural artefacts are restored when they are returned and then put on display in museums.
One of the returned artefacts was a 20,000-year-old human skeleton discovered in Belgium, which is now part of the Egyptian Civilization National Museum in Cairo.
In 2020, Egyptian authorities appealed to Interpol to help find a bust of Pharaoh Tutankhamun sold at a London auction.
Christie's auction house held a sale on July 4, at which a 3,000-year-old bust was sold for $5.97 million (about 680 million rubles).
This has caused discontent in Egypt.
The Egyptian side also claims that the artefact was illegally removed from the Karnak temple in Luxor in the 1970s.
The head of Tutankhamun, depicted as the sun god Amun, has been in a private collection and has not been on the market since 1985.
How the relic ended up in Europe is unknown.
Egypt has in recent years actively sought to repatriate illegally exported antiquities from the country at different times.
Authorities say 95 percent of the illegal antiquities are the result of black market archaeologists.
"The Crimean Tatars are not taken into account" - and this is correct, since the Crimean Tatars (232,000) are an independent people (close to the Turks).
If you want to add, only 42,000 people - Crimean Tatars (Caucasian Tatars) - live in Crimea (see census).
The Crimean Tatars are a separate people, and the name of this people consists of two words!
They are united only by the Turkic language group.
FT: Credit Suisse wants to access employees' personal mobile devices
Credit Suisse is requiring its employees to give the bank access to their personal mobile devices, according to the Financial Times.
The problem is that in Europe and the US, Swiss banks do not provide their employees with corporate devices, instead offering a discount on the purchase of a mobile phone or smartphone from a partner telecommunications operator.
Under current rules, the bank can review information on corporate devices issued to its staff, as they are used for business purposes with colleagues or clients.
The bank has the right to check mobile devices in extreme cases - for example, if an employee used it to arrange a meeting with a client that was not approved by Credit Suisse.
Now, however, after many employees have switched to remote work, the bank wants to extend this rule to all devices used for work.
According to the newspaper, the bank's management has set a deadline by which employees can familiarize themselves with the new rule.
Credit Suisse has not commented on the new requirement officially.
Sontelle Vivre Dual royal 70x200.
In the center of the Vivre Dual royal mattress, a high-quality and durable block of TFK 18 high-performance springs was placed.
The natural coconut fibre layers add firmness, the zonal latex distributes the load more evenly, the latex with Aloe Vera provides hygiene for the sleeping area, and the embossed foam relaxes.
A mattress with symmetrical average firmness and high height (30 cm).
The product is delivered in a tight roll and is ready for use shortly after unpacking.
The cover is made of durable tricot fabric with a lining on a comfortable layer.
The fabric of the cover does not wrinkle or stretch over time.
Part 4
The last year of Sergey Yesenin's life, 1925, was fruitful in terms of creativity, but difficult for the poet's earthly existence and his "ego."
He is no longer part of any literary group, he is on his own, but he is well known, in demand, sometimes harshly criticized, but the reading public is ready to carry him on their shoulders.
More than 60 poems were written in a year, many of which are masterpieces, and the cycle "Persian motifs" was completed, the poem "Anna Snegir" was written, 8 books were published, and the collection "Russkaya Sovetskaya" was published.
And the main success was in June 1925, when the Gosizdat publishing house concluded a contract with Yesenin for the publication of his works in three volumes.
No one has been so honoured by contemporary poets, he is the first!
In addition, it yielded very good money - the contract stipulated a monthly payment of 1000 rubles for 20 months (the plant director, for example, received 300 rubles a month, the engineer - 200).
The money was needed more than ever that year.
Eseyin married Tolstaya's great-granddaughter, Sofya Tolstaya, and had to arrange the family's household, care for Tolstaya's sisters, Katya and Sasha, and his mother.
It seemed like life was getting back on track, there was something to be happy about, but for him everything was tinged with dark tones, as if the nightmare from the poem "The Black Man" (written in November 1925 and published after Yessenin's death) had come to life:
My friend, my friend,
I am very, very sick.
I don't know where this pain came from.
Or the wind is blowing
Over an empty and deserted field,
That is, like a hedge in September.
Alcohol poisons the brain.
Many friends noted that Yessenin had a bad day, looked bad, and was clearly ill.
More and more, there are meltdowns, nervous breakdowns.
And the reason, perhaps, is not only alcoholism...
However, if such a diagnosis - alcoholism - was given to Sergey Alexandrovich, no reliable documents remain.
For example, those from May 1923, when Yessenin was treated by his fourth wife, the American Isadora Duncan, at a clinic in Paris, by Professor Petr Gannushkin (he would see Yessenin again two years later, in Moscow).
But there are plenty of evidence of the poet's drunkenness, scandals, and arrests - scattered in dozens of memoirs.
From the beginning of the 20s, the poet's terrible love affair with the green dragon developed rapidly.
In the summer of 1923, Yessenin briefly settled with his friend, the imagist Ivan Starzhev.
Amazingly, Esenin never had his own flat in Moscow or in St. Petersburg, he was always living in rented apartments, in hotels or with friends.
The veteran remembers:
"He only came to sleep, and most of the time he was drunk and incoherent.
One day, returning at four in the morning, Yessenin fell on the staircase...
He fell and scraped his face and wheezed.
Having come to his senses, he began to continuously cough, spraying blood everywhere..."
And even after his trip around Europe and the United States (then there was a dry law in the States, but Duncan brought with her a decent amount of alcohol) Yessenin admitted:
"I didn't see anything there, just cabbages and streets...
I've already forgotten about people...
And, of course, he drank...
And I was drinking because I was homesick."
Pirelli Scorpion Winter 265/45 R20 108V
The Pirelli Scorpion Winter winter tyre is based on a high-performance rubber and silica compound that provides long-lasting, effective wear, uniform wear, and load resistance.
The linear tread pattern of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyre ensures low rolling resistance and directional stability.
Four deep grooves effectively channel water, mud and debris from the contact patch of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tread pattern, reducing slip and aquaplaning.
3D-lamination enhances grip on slippery roads, snow and ice.
The large shoulder area increases the lateral grip of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter when manoeuvring, increases traction and reduces stopping distances.
Small cracks and crevices allow heat to escape.
Promtex-Oriente Duet Latex Econom 100x195
Promtex-Oriente Duet Latex Econom - modern interpretation of the budget model in the premium class line.
The base of the mattress is a block of independent double springs Duet.
A softer spring of smaller size is inserted inside the large spring.
This allows for a more even distribution of the load on the mattress.
On both sides of the mattress, there is a filler – artificial latex.
It is a substitute for natural leather, but it is denser and more expensive.
The flexibility and elasticity of this material increases the comfort of the mattress.
The artificial latex is hypoallergenic and does not absorb moisture or dust.
A mattress will suit a couple with a big weight difference (from 30 kilograms).
There is no wave effect here, where the lighter partner slides towards the heavier one.
A pleasant, soft to the touch cover made from practical jacquard Sense is lined with a layer of sintepon.
Natural fabrics do not accumulate static electricity.
It may be possible to manufacture this mattress model in a rolled-up (vacuum roll) version.
Now his son is almost 16, and he's long since stopped wanting to hit him.
All his energy is focused on choosing what he will do to earn a living.
He's much more responsible than I was at his age or my husband, who had a few run-ins with the law before we got married.
The father cares for his young daughter.
And he loved it, as Lermontov wrote, "with a strange love."
Why did the girl cry at the exam when she hadn't failed it yet?
Why he didn't tell his daughter it wasn't a school.
She'll have a tail.
Well, what?
Re-do.
Millions of students know this.
What are we talking about, anyway?
The Polish Ministry of Foreign Affairs considers that Belarus uses migrants as "weapons" against the EU
The Polish Ministry of Foreign Affairs considers that Belarus uses migrants as "weapons"
Deputy Foreign Minister of Poland Pawel Jablonski expressed the opinion that the President of Belarus Alexander Lukashenko used refugees as "weapons" against the European Union and intends to return to this "operation" next year.
A corresponding statement was made by the deputy head of the MFA in an interview with the Australian Financial Review newspaper.
According to Yablochinski, the sanctions against Belarus have temporarily "stopped Lukashenko," but he "is actively looking for new ways."
The Polish official also believes that illegal migrants will now be used as weapons "in many parts of the world."
As kp.ru wrote, earlier the European Union introduced the fifth package of sanctions against Belarus.
It involved 17 individuals and 11 organizations.
In Europe, they have stated that they are ready to expand the restrictive measures against the republic, "if the situation in the country does not improve."
In response, Minsk introduced a food embargo on a wide range of goods from countries that previously decided to impose sanctions against Belarus.
A 60x100 cm clothing cover, spandex, blue color.
To keep your clothes looking good for a long time, you need to take good care of them.
Proper storage will extend the life of your furniture and keep it looking attractive.
This garment bag will help us!
Benefits.
By using a garment bag, you save a lot of space.
It's especially relevant if you have a lot of stuff and a small closet.
A charming exterior.
No more dresses, no more skirts and no more tops hanging all over the place.
Neatly folded clothes allow you to sort them and hide them from prying eyes.
For people who use shelves instead of a regular cabinet, this is the best option.
The cover is a reliable protection against dust and dirt, insects, mechanical damage or possible fading.
It does not allow clothing to change shape during long-term storage, and prevents the formation of lumps.
The features of the clothes’ linings.
The special material will allow your clothes to "breathe."
The service life of such a cover is not limited.
They can store not only clothes, but also bed linen, pillows, bed linen.
The cover is sealed with a strong lightning strike.
Important to remember!
Prepare items for long-term storage in advance: clean them, iron out creases.
Choose the optimal size case: things should not bend from the bottom.
It is not recommended to hang several bulky items in one pouch: they may get damaged.
If you value order and cleanliness, take care of your belongings, want to preserve them and extend their service life - order a cover for clothes.
Go to the big catalogue and choose the product of the desired colour and size at a favourable price!
"Not by the hat": when a velvet jacket turns a man into a laughing stock
In the secular events of 2021, the dominant style was the velvet jacket.
Perhaps the first to announce his new fashion decision was Daniel Craig.
He was already at the premiere of the film "It's Not Time to Die" in September, where he appeared in a velvet maroon jacket and a traditional "Bond" tuxedo.
Following his example, Prince William has twice followed suit, first donning a non-royal green velvet jacket for the Earthshot Prize awards ceremony, and then opting for a more traditional look for the Royal Variety performance in support of the Royal Variety Charity.
A couple of weeks ago, the trend caught up with Lionel Messi.
The footballer arrived to pick up his seventh Golden Ball in a velvet Dolce & Gabbana suit.
By the way, his sons were dressed in the same.
AliExpress has already noted the growing demand for men's velvet jackets in Russia.
According to the service's analysts, they have been purchased 1.4 times more often.
The most popular are warm velvet jackets with a lining and a tucked-in silhouette, the main colors are dark beige, burgundy, dark blue and, of course, black.
The average price of such models is from 3 to 6 thousand rubles. Men prefer to buy only jackets - they choose velvet suits less often.
They can be bought not only from online retailers.
Budget options are available at H&M, Mango, Next and Zara.
In the luxury segment, this season, there are practically all brands represented - Brioni, Paul Smith, Etro and Saint Laurent.
The most coveted is the model of the Gucci brand, which appeared in one of the premieres of the film "House Gucci" - the brand ambassador Jared Leto.
When choosing expensive-brand jackets, you can be sure that the velvet is made of silk.
The special weaving technique produces a dense fabric with a fuzzy outer texture and a smooth inner side.
More budget-friendly options are made from cotton or polyamide, but they last less.
Fashion expert Lamoda Ilia Vakhushkin warns that in the case of the velvet jacket, the main thing is not its model or style, but appropriateness.
“Velvet requires evening light, so this jacket is ideal for a party or a formal event, explains Vakhoshkin. “It will also work for those occasions when the dress code is “Black Tie” or “Creative Black Tie”.
Another important criterion is the buyer's status.
“A man in a velvet jacket should first of all have a proper, well-to-do party, the authors of the Telegram channel about men’s fashion “Krasavchik Bramblell” say. “The owners of velvet jackets, as a rule, belong to the class of people who rarely buy tickets.
They are simply invited to themed parties, where the dress code is always specified.
Ilya Vakhoshkin suggests combining a velvet jacket with similar items: classic trousers with stripes, a plain shirt, a silk tie, loafers with studs, and brooches.
Too simple and mundane things will look out of place.
Fashion experts from "Bramell's Gorgeous" are certain: it would be inappropriate for a regular employee in a corporation to wear a designer jacket, but if we're talking about "the manager among those who run this event, then - yes, it fits."
If the employee is lower in rank and his goal is to move up in the complex company hierarchy or to get financial bonuses, then it is better not to wear a silk jacket.
Management will definitely assess this phrase as “not for the faint of heart”, the editors of the men’s fashion Telegram channel believe.
Very ambiguous feelings about the voice.
It's an unnatural sound, so drawn out.
And it has nothing to do with the sweet face of the young girl.
To be honest, I don't understand the admiration of those around me.
But I wish him all the best in life!
It's all about the money - alternative energy is well lobbied, i.e. paid for.
Billions of dollars.
Are they in pain?
No, electricity prices have gone up.
Conventional energy is also out of favour - gas, oil and coal have all been cheaper to buy than they are now.
Wild demand for fuel.
The penny is dripping.
And who was flying it in the middle of the flight?
As usual, the ordinary consumer.
Are the problems of the Indians affecting the sheriff?
Therefore, it is not correct to consider Western politicians as idiots who have caused the energy crisis.
They did their job.
For a not-so-bad payback.
I didn't see one attractive person in the pictures in the article.
Just average for the average passenger.
Perhaps if such characters are so convinced of their beauty that they decide to show it all over the wagon, then they probably won't get away with it.
But only due to mental illness and ignorance, such "beauties" are, but not because of their appearance.
Kazbek, "a slave who is aware of his condition and fighting against it, is a revolutionary.
The slave, unaware of his slavery and living in a silent, unconscious, and speechless life of slavery, is simply a slave.
Rab, who has runny nose, when he self-deprecatingly describes the pleasures of life as a slave and praises the good and kind master, is a slave, a scoundrel."
Immunologist says revaccination in 4-5 months will help protect against Omikron strain
Revaccination four to five months later could protect against the new coronavirus strain ‘Omicron’.
Immunologist Nikolai Kryuchkov said that the six-month period, taking into account the emergence of a new strain, is “a very long period”
"In the previous strains, such a period was normal, but now it is better to conduct the procedure after five months, and for people with chronic diseases - after four," the expert said, urging to simultaneously with the vaccination campaign to start revaccination.
Kruchkov also noted that early revaccination provides a good level of neutralising antibodies.
"If a person has received two vaccinations and a booster, or has been infected and vaccinated, or has been vaccinated and infected, then he has "hybrid immunity," that is, antibodies of many types and neutralizing enough," the expert explained.
The "Big Seven" warned Russia of "significant consequences" in the event of an invasion of Ukraine
The G7 countries (the United Kingdom, Germany, Italy, Canada, the United States, France and Japan) issued a statement on the outcome of the Foreign Ministers' meeting in Liverpool.
It stresses that "military aggression" by Russia against Ukraine "will have huge consequences and will be very costly" for Moscow, but does not specify specific measures in the document.
"We, the Foreign Ministers of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom and the United States of America and the High Representative of the European Union, are united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine," the statement said.
The ministers then call on Russia to "de-escalate, use diplomatic channels and comply with its international obligations on transparency of military activities," as President Biden said in a video call with Russian President Vladimir Putin on December 7.
"We reaffirm our support for France and Germany's efforts in the Normandy format to achieve full implementation of the Minsk agreements in order to resolve the conflict in eastern Ukraine," the foreign ministers of the "Big Seven" also said.
Any use of force to change borders is strictly prohibited under international law.
Russia should not doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have huge consequences and a serious price in return," they warn.
We reaffirm our unwavering commitment to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Ukraine, as well as the right of any sovereign state to determine its future.
We welcome the restrained position of Ukraine.
We will intensify our cooperation in our common and comprehensive response," the statement added.
Earlier in the day, British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss said Russia would face "serious consequences" if it invaded Ukraine.
According to her, the meeting showed the "united voice of the G7 countries, which account for 50% of the world's GDP, and which very clearly stated that the invasion of Ukraine would have huge consequences for Russia."
Pfizer vaccine found 32 times less effective against omicron strain
The effectiveness of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the Omicron strain of the coronavirus is 32 times lower than that of other variants of the disease.
The conclusion was reached by researchers from the University of Hong Kong and the Chinese University of Hong Kong, South China Morning Post (SCMP) reported.
The vaccine was deemed less effective based on a study of antiviral activity in people who received two doses of the COVID-19 vaccine.
"We see that most people have a high level of antiviral activity against the original Sars-CoV-2 strain, but this ability has been significantly reduced against the omicron variant," Professor Malik Peiris explained.
At the same time, scientists stressed that vaccination remains the most reliable way to protect against the severe course of the disease in the event of a coronavirus infection.
Previously, researchers at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted the development of a coronavirus pandemic based on the influence of the omicron strain.
The authors of the study concluded that the omicron strain could cause a new wave of viral circulation and an increase in mortality if additional measures are not taken.
Ukraine's Defense Minister accuses Germany of blocking NATO arms supplies to Kiev
The head of the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense, Alexey Reznikov, accused the government of former German Chancellor Angela Merkel of blocking the purchase of deadly weapons by Kiev within the framework of NATO.
In an interview with the Financial Times on December 12, Reznikov recalled that last month Germany vetoed the purchase of anti-sniper systems and sniper rifles by Ukraine.
At the same time, it is noted that later Berlin softened its position on assault rifles, recognizing them as lethal weapons.
According to the defense minister, Kiev intends to acquire the above-mentioned weapons within the framework of bilateral agreements with allies.
In particular, this refers to the United States, Great Britain, Lithuania and France.
Meanwhile, the FT notes that the position of the new German government under Chancellor Olaf Scholz on the delivery of weapons to Ukraine remains unclear.
Earlier on Sunday, Ukraine's ambassador to Germany, Andriy Melnyk, said that Kiev should not expect weapons deliveries from Berlin under Chancellor Angela Merkel.
According to him, the previous leadership of Germany explained its refusal to supply weapons by the risk of escalation of the conflict in Donbass, despite the "occupation of Russia" of part of the Ukrainian territory.
Such a "nonsensical" position, the diplomat is sure, Germany will keep under the new chancellor.
In August, the Ukrainian leader, Volodymyr Zelensky, said that Kiev was expecting help from Berlin in equipping the navy.
In Ukraine, it is expected that Germany will be a "technical partner," the president added.
It was also noted that in the spring of this year, the co-chair of the German Green Party, Robert Habeck, visited the republic, where he spoke in favor of selling Kiev defensive weapons.
Sergei NOSOV 2, no, bad eyesight is no excuse.
"And" instead of "E"?
To pass in large numbers of commas?
And write instead of write.
No, you are illiterate.
For the philologist, it is a disgrace.
Fishing game set: e/f light, sound, in game field, 2 fishing rods, 5 figures, bat. 3AA not incl.
Electric fishing is fun and useful for the development of the child.
Playing, the baby will be training fine motor skills of the hands, developing dexterity, accuracy and attention.
A toy should be turned on, as five miniature fish begin to swim around an imitation pond to a cheerful tune.
The child's task is to catch them all!
You can play alone or in pairs: the set includes 2 fishing rods.
The toy operates on 3 AA batteries (not included).
The playing field (LxWxH) is 21x17x4 cm.
The product is made of plastic.
Recommended age: 3 years +
In Moscow, the winners of the Arsenyev Prize were named - Russian Gazette
The solemn ceremony of awarding the winners of the third season of the All-Russian Literary Prize “Far East” in honor of
V. K. Arsenyeva passed in Moscow.
As reported on the prize's Instagram page, a total of 89 applications were received by the organizing committee this season.
63 players made the cut.
The leaders in the number of applications submitted were Primorsky and Khabarovsk Krai - 13 and 11 applications.
More than 60 works were submitted for the award in three categories: "Long prose," "Short prose," "Prose for children."
Nine works made the shortlist - three in each category.
Alexander Filkin (Primorsky Krai) won the Long Prose category with the book “Inscription on the Gospel”.
The winner was awarded the prize by Deputy Prime Minister - the Plenipotentiary Representative of the President of the Russian Federation in the South Federal District Yuri Trutnev.
In the short prose category, the best was awarded to Lyubov Bezbakh (Sakhalin region) for the work “The Whisper of the Night Rain”.
She received the award from the Russian Minister for the Development of the Far East and the Arctic, Alexey Chekunkov.
In the “Children’s prose” category, the winner was the Buryat writer Nina Belomestnova and her “Golden Thread”.
The author was awarded by the screenwriter, writer, candidate of philology and the chairman of the Jury of the Andrey Gelashvili Prize.
All winners will receive 500,000 rubles.
We will recall that the “Far East” Prize is awarded to the authors of the best works on the Far East theme.
The main goal of the award is not only to award the winners and tell about contemporary authors, but also to attract cultural interest to the Far East as a territory of priority development in the 21st century.
Novels, short stories, collections of short stories, or stories, as well as non-fiction prose and memoirs are eligible.
In this case, the author’s place of residence is not important, the main thing is to write in Russian.
The official website of the award: https://arseenovprize.ru/.
Skovoroda, d=22 cm, with handle, dark marble, 4278884.
The Kukmara "marble" is made of cast aluminium and is covered with an innovative anti-graffiti water-based marble coating reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
The features of the “Marble” series.
The significant thickness of the walls and bottom prevents deformation of the body, ensures durability, and provides the necessary coating strength.
A high-performance, anti-graffiti, water-based coating is reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
An environmentally safe anti-perspirant that does not contain PFOA (perfluorooctanoic acid).
Ideal heat distribution across the entire surface of the pan, long-lasting heat retention.
The possibility of using the minimum amount of fat.
Anti-graffiti marble coating is applied by spraying, which guarantees the exceptional durability of the coating during operation.
Small scratches and minor abrasions on the cooking surface do not affect the properties of the non-stick coating and the longevity of the cookware.
The products will not spoil and retain their taste.
The possibility of preparing tasty and healthy food without adding oil, like on hot stones.
The bottom is thickened up to 6 mm.
High thermal conductivity and ergonomics.
Washing is easy.
Suitable for all types of tiles except induction.
You can wash in a washing machine.
The wall consists of 6 layers, the inner coating is "marble".
A high-performance water-based anti-corrosive coating reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
A reinforced foundation.
A layer with a rough surface for better adhesion of the coating.
The aluminium body is up to 6 mm thick.
The exterior anti-corrosive coating is “marble”.
The Kukmara cooker will turn the ordinary process of cooking into a pleasant and easy activity for any housewife.
Years... many years ago, I did the same thing.
He combined the dining room with the kitchen.
The apartment is three-room.
Was.
Of course, the project, the permit, the new technical passport, everything is done in accordance with the law.
In the living room, they made a bookcase and a large wardrobe.
A door was opened in the kitchen, and a lot of space was created.
For almost 10 years living in this apartment, we have never regretted anything.
Mistakes were made - instead of a bath, they installed a curved bathroom cabinet.
I have regretted this a hundred times!
I only recently realized that I love rom-coms.
But the beautiful world of the Roma is still closed to me, except for "Barcardi" and "Captain Morgan."
What else would you recommend and what would be the best way to start this wonderful relationship?
I got sick, too.
I won't be getting vaccinated.
He came to Chernomorets for “rehabilitation”.
Only the weather has gone wrong...
The houses are pretty, but normal birds will not settle in the bright houses, ornithologists say.
Plus, the paint and other chemicals will repel the birds.
Only natural materials and natural colors.
Thank you, I will definitely try it.
And what does Japan have to do with it?
Thanks for the recipe.
And what varieties of apples should be used according to this recipe?
It's really good.
I add a little bit of chopped celery and a green apple.
Try it.
A zombie recently declared that the car industry is experiencing an unprecedented shortage of semiconductors.
A chart appeared on the screen showing which country produced what percentage of these semiconductors (presumably microcontrollers).
Russia was not on the list.
That's it!
In the United States, with their expensive workforce, it is profitable, and here in Russia, it is unprofitable!
And my mother-in-law was inducing me.
I miss her, she's not with us.
If I had seen her well, things could have been different.
But beyond the hatred, the gossip, and the scandals, there's nothing to remember.
I feel sorry for her, she has lived her life in bitterness.
Mercedes protests result of Abu Dhabi Grand Prix
The German Mercedes team, whose pilot Lewis Hamilton finished second in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix behind Red Bull's Max Verstappen, has filed a protest against the final results of the race, Formula 1's press service reports.
Mercedes believes that the race was breached by Article 48.12 and Article 48.8 of the Formula 1 Sporting Regulations.
In the first case, the German team challenges the decision of the judges to return the runners to the circle with the leaders in one lap.
According to the second, Ferstappen overtook Hamilton in the permitted "restart" zone.
We add that the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, according to which Verstappen overtook Hamilton by 2.256 seconds and won the Formula 1 world championship is preliminary, as the Mercedes protests are not known
G7 warns Russia of consequences for invasion of Ukraine
Foreign ministers of the Group of Seven warned of "serious consequences" for Russia if it continued its military aggression against Ukraine, according to a final statement by the parties.
Participants of the meeting also noted that they condemn the strengthening of Russian armed forces on the country's borders.
"Russia should have no doubt that any further military aggression against Ukraine will have serious consequences and serious costs," the statement published on the British government website said.
G7 ministers and the EU High Representative noted that "we are united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine."
British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss warned of "significant consequences" for Russia in the event of an invasion of Ukraine at a press conference in Liverpool.
We have made it clear that any invasion would have serious consequences...
The G7 wants Russia to stop its aggression against Ukraine," she said (quoted by TASS).
Previously, at the summit in Liverpool, G7 foreign ministers agreed that to resolve the crisis caused by the buildup of Russian troops on the border with Ukraine, the parties need to return to the negotiating table.
The talks were in the "Norman format."
The North Atlantic Alliance also spoke out in favor of dialogue on Ukraine in the "Norman format."
Russian Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said that by inviting Russia and Ukraine back to the negotiating table, the G7 countries "have written themselves off as unable to take responsibility for their own mistakes."
The Homsu Diamond shoulder bag.
The Diamond shoulder bag is perfect for sports, travel or just a stroll.
It is convenient to take it with you, it is roomy, made of durable and lightweight fabric.
The main section is opened by a lightning strike, which can be done with ease even while on the move.
Stylish and eye-catching design will appeal to those who have a discerning eye for accessories.
The bag has a universal size of 19x12x7 cm and a strap length of 40 to 60 cm, which allows it to accommodate various items, from a passport to a mobile phone.
The material allows for easy removal of the belt pouch using various household items.
For convenience, you can use a special regulator for the size of the strap.
Ways to return stolen money through online stores have been revealed
There are several ways to get back money stolen from online stores and not become a victim of fraud in the future.
Experts in information security revealed them in an interview with RBC.
To reduce the risk of large losses in the event of a data breach, it is recommended to keep the main funds on the card or bank account that are not used for online shopping.
Some of the savings can be deposited in a savings account and withdrawn as needed.
Experts also recommend setting up a separate card for online purchases.
If the money was stolen during a purchase at a store that doesn't use 3D Secure protection, you can initiate a chargeback.
“According to the rules established by payment systems, for unauthorized transactions not carried out with the use of 3D Secure, responsibility is imposed on the participant in the payment chain who does not use this service”, the representative of Promsvyazbank clarified.
An expert from the international payment provider Ecommpay, Arthur Zaremba, noted that the buyer has the right to file a claim with the bank to dispute the fraudulent transaction no later than 120 days after the purchase.
In addition, if the perpetrator used a card on online resources that did not require two-factor authentication, the transaction can be disputed and the money returned.
It is noted that in some cases, online stores themselves return the money to the client if the order has not yet been shipped.
On November 19, the Public Council member, the director of the Internet Safety League Ekaterina Mizulina reported that in 2021 alone, 11,000 requests were received for various cases of fraud: from the sale of fake documents to the theft of personal data.
In her view, an effective solution in the current circumstances could be the creation of a single window for complaints against online fraudsters.
Scholz arrives in Poland to discuss Nord Stream 2 and EU legislation
Newly elected German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw for talks on the migrant crisis at the border with Belarus, the independence of the Polish judiciary, the build-up of Russian troops on the Ukrainian border and the situation with the Russian Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline.
While Scholz has stated his desire to maintain good relations between Germany and Poland for many years, the leaders of the two countries expressed clear expectations of each other.
Polish Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki said he would call on Scholz to speak out against Nord Stream 2, a pipeline that is supposed to deliver Russian gas to Germany bypassing Ukraine.
Moravcevic believes that Russia can use the gas pipeline against Europe as a means of political pressure.
Germany, in turn, supported Poland's efforts to stop the flow of migrants trying to enter the country from Belarus.
Berlin said it would help Warsaw and Brussels resolve the crisis.
However, the Polish judicial system remains one of the sources of disagreement.
The European Court of Justice has fined Poland, finding that the judicial reforms carried out by the right-wing Law and Justice party violate EU law.
Poland refused to pay the fine and its supreme court ruled that national law takes precedence over EU rules.
The new German government, sworn in on Wednesday, despite demands from Poland and the United States, has not taken on any public commitments to stop the Nord Stream 2 pipeline in the event of a Russian invasion of Ukraine.
U.S. officials have told congressional members they have reached an understanding with Germany to shut the pipeline if Russia invades Ukraine, a senior U.S. congressional official said on Tuesday.
German officials have not confirmed the reports, but Scholz warned Wednesday of the consequences if Russia breached Ukraine's border, and the G7 representatives reiterated the position Sunday.
Dmitri, look more carefully.
The view from the window is the same, the size of the window has not changed.
They removed the wall between the kitchen and the room, so you can see part of the second window.
In fact, those who are unfamiliar with the initial planning are in doubt.
But I know such apartments very well and I can see how they have been redecorated.
Let everything be fine with them.
It always surprises me when they write about the means to clean the toilet, the sink, the shelves, the taps.
You only get them once a year at Easter, so you've got to scrub them.
Just don't get dirty.
Minzifry wants to give writers residencies
The future Fund for the support of Russian writers will receive federal property left over from the Union of Writers of the USSR and the Literary Fund of the USSR.
Residencies for writers will be created on its basis, the “Parliamentary Gazette” was told by the Ministry of Culture, which will be the founder of the foundation.
The Ministry of Digital Development is preparing a draft presidential decree on the creation of the Fund for Support of Russian Writers.
An explanatory note clarifies that the fund will be responsible for caring for the buildings and structures that once belonged to the Soviet Union's Writers' Union and the Literature Fund.
“A significant number of real estate objects, previously belonging to the Literary Fund of the USSR, have been transferred to the ownership of the Russian Federation, including those located in the writers’ village of Peredelkino, the Komarovo settlement in the Leningrad region, and others”, the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media press service told Parlamentskaya Gazeta.
The draft law stipulates that the Fund's charter should state that it is "established for the purpose of promoting literary activities by creating the necessary conditions for the creative work of writers."
“The creation of conditions for creative activity is understood to mean the creation of writer’s residences in different regions of Russia, in which there would be comfortable conditions for creativity,” the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications, and Mass Media explained to us.
520 rubles for one cut tomato?
The breadcrumb is literally a layer of dough from a 550-ruble pack.
Three pieces of fish in a can for 570...
No, it looks, of course, delicious, but the price is just outrageous.
It seems that the Belarusians have gathered all the rich people.
Doctors warn of risks of long-term use of blood thinners after COVID-19 and before vaccination
Doctors Irina Yarceva and Sergey Tokarev warned of the dangers of uncontrolled use of anticoagulants after contracting the coronavirus infection COVID-19 and before vaccination against the coronavirus.
A physician-therapist, immunologist Irina Yarceva said that independent prevention of the possible formation of blood clots after COVID-19 can trigger a stroke.
Yartseva explained that the thrombolytic drugs are not for everyone, only if the patient was hospitalized, was in a hospital, and complications were detected.
The doctor may prescribe anti-coagulants (blood-thinning drugs that prevent excessive clot formation) based on your symptoms.
She said that now there is a lot of darkness - everybody is taking anticoagulants for a long time, and on top of that they are getting complications, such as hemorrhagic strokes (bleeding into the brain).
The head of the UrOFO's prophylactologist, the scientific director of the Society of Preventive Medicine Specialists, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Sergey Tokarev, in an interview with URA.RU, said that Russians are now often using anti-coagulants, even before getting a coronavirus vaccine.
According to Dr. Tokarev, citizens are turning to dubious advice on the Internet and are beginning to self-medicate.
There are such citizens who, a week before vaccination, start taking anti-coagulants on their own initiative.
And during the preliminary examination before the vaccination, the doctors notice blood clots.
He stressed that it is extremely dangerous to take any medicine without determining the cause of any symptom.
Potatoes are called a superfood to protect against hypertension
Studies have shown that regular consumption of this common and affordable vegetable can significantly reduce the risk of developing cardiovascular disease.
Potatoes are found in every kitchen and have amazing properties.
The product is rich in vitamins and trace elements that help the functioning of internal organs.
It helps with heart disease by improving circulation and lowering cholesterol, Semana reports.
Today, heart disease is the leading cause of early death.
To improve the situation, it is not only necessary to treat, but also to eat properly.
One of the helpers in such a situation will be a common potato.
According to scientists, this root vegetable contains a lot of vitamins B1, B3, B6, and also a very important for the body vitamin C.
In addition, potatoes contain phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, as well as riboflavin, folic and pantothenic acids.
Microelements help to effectively work all the internal systems of the body.
In addition to all this, the root vegetable fights natural age-related changes in the body, contains a lot of useful fiber for the digestive system.
Regular consumption can help prevent atherosclerosis and hypertension.
I had a case like that.
The lady came to see the apartment.
I came from another city to show it.
The ad featured detailed photos and a description of the apartment.
She was very disappointed because there was no "nice" kitchen and no "nice" balcony.
Apparently, there's nothing to do, and she's just looking at other people's apartments, while people are wasting their time.
About 145 thousand adolescents have been vaccinated with the first component of the COVID-19 vaccine in Kazakhstan
Information on the vaccination of adolescents, pregnant and breastfeeding women against coronavirus has been published in Kazakhstan, Kazinform reports with reference to the Ministry of Healthcare and Social Development of Kazakhstan.
Twenty people died of coronavirus and pneumonia in Kazakhstan in one day 85 coronavirus patients in critical condition - the Ministry of Health of the RK Most regions of Kazakhstan are in the "green zone" for coronavirus
As of December 11, 2021, 181,037 people received the first component of the vaccine, and 14,580 people received the second component.
Of these, the first dose: adolescents - 144,613, pregnant women - 10,645, breastfeeding women - 25,779.
The second dose: adolescents - 10,690, pregnant women - 1,141, breastfeeding women - 2,749.
The plumber who found the money in the church wall will get $20,000
The plumber who found the money in a church wall in the US state of Texas will be paid a reward.
The information was released in a press release by Crime Stoppers of Houston, a non-profit organization.
The incident took place at a large evangelical church, Lakewood, where pastor Joel Osteen promises that the faithful will be blessed with wealth and prosperity.
In November 2021, plumber Justin Coyle renovated one of the church's toilets and found thousands of dollars in cash and checks under insulation.
He turned the find over to the church and, he says, didn't even get a thank you from Austin.
"I wanted to hear him say, "You know, Justin, you did the right thing.
We understand what you did and what you could have done," KPRC-TV quoted her as saying.
It appears the find is connected to a theft that happened at Lakewood Church seven years ago.
About $200,000 in cash and $400,000 in checks were stolen from the church's safe.
The money was insured, so the church did not suffer any losses.
However, a reward of $25,000 was announced for information on the perpetrators.
Justin Coyle could not claim the sum as the award had already expired.
Despite that, Crime Stoppers of Houston, which once offered a $5,000 reward and later received $20,000 in donations from Lakewood Church, decided to reward the plumber's honesty.
He will receive $20,000.
Earlier, it was reported that police questioned pastor Joel Osteen about the money found in the church's wall.
Tanya, her words, her actions - that is her character as a real person.
That's why there is such a negative attitude towards her.
And it's not that "she is financially much richer than all the girls," as they write here.
There are people who are richer, but not all of them behave like this madam.
Promtex-Orient Soft Cocos 1 mattress, size 190x190.
Orthopedic mattress Soft Cocos 1.
The basis is the TFK block (256 springs per square metre).
Independent springs help to distribute the load correctly.
Coconut coir (material made from the fibres of the coconut palm) is used as a filler.
Between the filler and the spring block are layers of felt.
Both sides of the mattress are above average firmness.
Jacquard Sense removable cover: 5% cotton, 95% polyester.
The tissue density is 116 g/m².
Again, just and delicious.
She was looking for chicken recipes on your page.
We were given a chicken.
Our friends grew it in their garden.
It weighs more than four kilograms.
I would like to make it more appetizing.
I'm looking for a recipe for chicken baked in beer.
Have you tried that?
Somehow I trust you more than just Internet recipes.
A new case of human infection with avian influenza virus has been reported in China
A new case of human infection with highly pathogenic avian influenza virus H5N6 has been reported in China.
This was reported by the RTHK radio station, citing a notice from the Hong Kong health authorities, TASS reports.
The 68-year-old resident of Huai'an city in the southern province of Guangdong contracted the disease after caring for poultry at his home.
His condition is assessed as critical by doctors.
The first human infection with the H5N6 strain of the virus was recorded in May 2014 in the southwestern province of Sichuan.
Since then, the number of such cases in the country has reached 53.
In Brazil, citizens are required to present vaccination certificates when entering the country
In Brazil, Judge Luiz Roberto Barroso of the Federal Supreme Court (STF) has ordered that COVID-19 passports be required to enter the country.
This is reported by CNN Brasil.
Citizens who have contraindications to vaccination are released from the requirement to present a vaccination certificate.
Also included in the list of exceptions are those who have come from countries where the vaccine is not available.
"The situation is even more serious if we consider that Brazil is a popular tourist destination for New Year's, pre-Carnival and carnival parties, and other events, which would lead to an increase in tourist traffic," said Barros.
Earlier, Brazilian authorities required non-vaccinated coronavirus patients to observe a five-day quarantine.
Full Covid-19 protection scheme revealed
A virologist, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Honored Worker of Science of the Russian Federation Anatoly Altshtein in an interview with Ura.ru revealed the scheme of complete protection from the coronavirus infection.
According to him, this can be achieved by introducing an injection and using a nasal vaccine.
When administered intranasally, IgA antibodies are produced in large amounts. This does not occur when the vaccine is given by injection.
Antibodies A protect the mucous membranes, so the virus cannot enter the body.
Inside, after vaccination, we produce the most immunoglobulins G (antibodies).
And if you administer both vaccines, you will get a lot of IgA and IgG antibodies. But there is no decision on double vaccination yet," the doctor explained.
The head of the UrOFO’s profilactologist, Doctor of Medical Sciences Sergey Tokarev, in turn, stated that the main advantage of the nasal vaccination combined with the injection is the possibility of no longer being a carrier of COVID-19.
He added that this would help to ensure that the body's defence is as strong as possible.
Earlier, the Minister of Health of Nizhny Novgorod Region David Melik-Guseinov stated that the new outbreak of the COVID-19 pandemic will lead to the spread of a new coronavirus infection among children.
He said that such a picture is being seen in other countries where the latest wave of the pandemic has come earlier.
Inna, hmm...
I talked to my horse (who died a long time ago) like that - if you're willing to trade a warm house, a feed, a scratch, love and games on a tethered horse, then come on.
But the pesel was trained and even smart.
I chose my society and went home.
The video shows how it works 90% of the time.
It wasn't taken from the ceiling, believe me.
I stopped many owners from chasing their dogs, even though they said, "Come on, 200,000 are running away (dachshunds), I'm taking them by the hand and pulling them in another direction."
In the end, the 200,000 went to the owner, not the dog that ran off somewhere.
Mass protests against vaccinations continue in Europe
More than forty thousand demonstrators took to the streets in the Austrian capital, Vienna.
They expressed dissatisfaction with the restrictive measures and the authorities' plans to make vaccination against COVID-19 compulsory.
From February next year, people who are not vaccinated will have to pay a fine of 3,600 euros.
The Spaniards, angered by the government's health policies, held a peaceful march in Madrid.
Some held signs saying "This is a false pandemic," "I won't get vaccinated."
A large-scale protest against the sanitary passports took place in Barcelona, the capital of Catalonia.
In the autonomous community, a COVID-19 certificate is required to enter bars, restaurants, sports facilities, retirement homes and night-time entertainment venues.
The decision to introduce health passports was taken in the wake of a rise in the number of coronavirus cases.
More than a thousand protesters protested against the tightening of restrictions and QR codes in Luxembourg.
The protest started peacefully, but then turned into clashes with the security forces.
A group of protesters began throwing stones at police.
In response, law enforcement officers used water cannons.
Nikolay S. does not even have a consensus at Wikipedia on this.
Kashevarova-Rudneva is also listed as "the first Russian doctor, doctor of medicine," probably because she started studying earlier.
Let's just not argue, I think they both deserve that title.
But he agrees with Zakharova on one point: Americans have only brought death and plunder to every country they have ever set foot in.
Lonax Cocos TFK 130x185 mattress.
A symmetrical mattress of natural coconut fibre on a TFK spring block.
The mattress is hard, with layers of natural coconut on both sides.
The base of the mattress is a block of independent TFK springs.
Independent springs help to evenly distribute the load, help the body to maintain its natural shape.
The natural coconut is hypoallergenic, hygienic, and has excellent air circulation.
The natural Jacquard cover is dense, wear-resistant, and pleasant to the touch.
It's sad and lonely to age alone, but it's inevitable, unfortunately.
It's very sad to read about it.
A man should live as long as he can serve himself and not be a burden to anyone.
All the best.
WHO finds omicron in dozens of countries in six weeks
The World Health Organization (WHO) said that the new coronavirus strain "omicron" has already been detected in 63 countries.
Several experts have already warned that the spread of the new strain could have catastrophic consequences.
The rate of spread of the strain was reported by the WHO.
As of December 9, the strain has been detected in 63 countries, in all six WHO regions.
This is despite the fact that it became actively spread only in late November.
The WHO also expressed concern about the rapid spread of the new variant of the coronavirus.
WHO experts expressed concern that the new strain, preliminary data suggests, could surpass the spread of the delta strain, or the Indian variant of the coronavirus, which is currently leading in all countries without exception.
Previously, World Health Organization (WHO) Director-General Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus said the Omicron strain is capable of having a significant impact on the course of the coronavirus pandemic.
The same conclusion was reached in the UK as well.
Experts at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM) believe that "omicron" will overtake "delta" in the coming months.
And the number of people who have been infected only in the UK will be about 1 million. This is despite the fact that officially "Omikron" is currently infecting a few hundred people in the country, and according to estimates, up to 10 thousand.
British experts predict tens of thousands of deaths from the Omicron strain, and more than 2,000 people will be admitted to hospital every day at its peak.
The British health service will not be able to cope with this.
The situation is complicated by the fact that according to the latest studies, the effectiveness of the vaccine of the Pfizer-BioNTech company against the "omicron" strain is 32 times lower than in other types of disease.
How Russian “Sputnik V” will react to “omicron” is unknown - this will become clear in the next few weeks.
The Gamaleya Center has only just begun testing the Russian vaccine on the Omikron strain.
Why would we see the stages of aging?
It would be better if you could see your exercise performance more clearly.
It is unclear in the first exercise as to how to do it: sitting on the heels or standing on the knees, as written, but how then to push the hands into the hips?
Or hands on your hips?
The curious Belka, you are right, the Internet is a completely different thing, it is easy and casual to talk to each other, and at a personal meeting, there is nothing to say.
And to actually see a human being, maybe that's not what you expected, maybe it didn't grab you - that's where the attitude comes from.
When she meets her person, then her views will change.
And again, Soviet time is called “the time of the devil”.
Then people believed in God a lot more than they do today.
And they were raised almost according to the laws of God (love of neighbor, do not steal, etc.).
Today's ideology is money at any price.
Glaubers like Glob are few and far between, but even if they are, the time of the Antichrist has come in the 90s...
Our Peterburg, or rather Leningrad, commune with Big Zelenaya is still in touch.
Of course, we are not the closest of friends, but we try to keep the warm relations of the older generation.
Maybe it's because there were no visitors, rooms weren't rented out, and the blockaded brotherhood didn't cancel.
Unfortunately, we are seeing more and more funerals.
Larissa Angelskaya, come on!
Human babies, especially males, are strong, mobile, energetic, playful, push, wrestle, fight just like their little "cousins" in the wild!
Only that they're not as soft as puppies or kittens, so bruises, welts, scrapes are common, and there's no such thing as a bumerang!
And why?
Did the brother hit you hard?
But you're always so careful that you never accidentally hurt anyone or yourself?
The SkySleep Wave Space BS mattress is 150x185 cm.
The Bonnell Wave Space BS (Wave Space BS) mattress has moderate firmness on both sides.
The comfortable layers of the mattress are a combination of coconut shell and artificial leather with a relief surface, ErgoFoam.
The cover is made of linen, the fabric of Jacquard weave.
It is durable, wear-resistant, and at the same time, it allows air to pass through it, which does not interfere with the ventilation of the mattress.
The cover is made of synthetic, which makes it soft.
A practical mattress for the bedroom.
Coir has antimicrobial properties, it is hard, evenly distributes the weight that falls on it.
The artificial latex with a grid-like surface provides the mattress with a micro-massage effect.
Durable materials, reliable construction.
The Bonnel block, in which springs are connected to each other, is characterized by reliability, it can withstand large loads and is suitable for couples with a small weight difference.
The perimeter of the product is reinforced with a PPU box - it prolongs the service life of the mattress, protects the springs from deformation along the edges.
Israel's Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu announced the start of vaccinations in schools
Israel's Health Ministry will begin an emergency campaign to increase vaccinations on Sunday.
From 12 December, vaccination against coronavirus will be carried out in schools throughout Israel.
Prime Minister of the Jewish State Naftali Bennett said at today's cabinet meeting that the issue of vaccinating the fourth dose for those at risk will also be examined.
In Israel, mass vaccination of the population against the coronavirus disease COVID-19 began on 20 December 2020.
Israelis are being vaccinated with the Pfizer vaccine.
Since 10 January last year, those vaccinated have been receiving their second dose.
The vaccination of 12-15 year olds in this country started in early June this year.
Currently, more than 5.78 million people have received both doses of the vaccine, and more than 4.12 million citizens have received the third dose.
Anna Gawer, well, probably a flea wouldn’t fall into a trap, it’s PAUCOOBRAZHE, as LYAIA put it.
In any case, I don't see any ticks.
But I am curious, is it possible that there is?
He needs to be given something else to tempt him
Dimax Genius 70x190 children's mattress
A two-sided baby mattress made of natural latex and natural coconut fibre, based on an independent EVS500 spring block.
A non-spring mattress made of latex and coconut for children.
Natural latex is a soft, elastic material, which is environmentally friendly, hypoallergenic and has excellent properties, making sleep as comfortable as possible.
The back of the mattress is medium-firm, comfortable, made of natural coconut fiber and latex.
The basis of the mattress is a block of independent springs.
The springs are arranged in such a way as to distribute the load evenly over the surface of the mattress, supporting the body in its natural position.
A great option for schoolchildren and teenagers.
The cover is made of polycotton.
The material is strong, wear-resistant and is not susceptible to abrasion.
Seven people killed in Brazil floods
At least seven people have died and 175 have been injured in the heavy rains that have hit the northeastern Brazilian states of Bahia and Minas Gerais.
This is reported by TASS with reference to the rescue services.
A non-tropical cyclone has been battering the border of these states since the middle of the week, resulting in rainfall totals of up to 450 mm in the region. In 25 municipalities in the state of Bahia, emergency measures have been declared due to flooding that has been the worst in 35 years.
Several bridges were destroyed, two river dams were destroyed, and traffic was blocked on three roads.
According to rescuers, about 5,700 people were left without shelter, and another 6,700 were forced to leave their homes.
The damage caused by the natural disaster affected more than 85,000 residents of the region.
Nika Lerman, I know Levomekol cream, I work with drugs.
It does a good job of treating inflammation.
Personally, I prefer Bepanthen for regenerating surface wounds and scabs, but you'll see that it's more effective on the spot.
The main thing is that the healing process is going, such a hole was, just to eat.
Hola, España, no me has escuchado y no me has entendido.
I will answer in the words of Mikhail Isakovsky: "Migratory birds fly by\nThey are looking for the past summer.
They fly to hot countries, but I don't want to fly, I want to stay with you, my native land!
I don't need the sun of another country, I don't need the land of another country."
And trust me, pictures from the park where I skied or my hometown will not be any worse.
By the way, it would be much more interesting to see your wonderful house with its interiors.
MAPED (France) Color'peps Twist, 12 colours, twisty, in plastic.
A set of 12 bright wax candles in a plastic case with a retractable rod.
They don't scratch, they don't stain your hands, they're absolutely safe.
They don't require stitching.
The body is made of high-quality, durable plastic.
Multi-layer packaging: a package on a lightning bolt.
$135 billion went into apps - Hi-Tech
In 2021, user spending in apps worldwide grew by 25%, and downloads grew by 8%.
The most popular video services in the world turned out to be various video services.
The most popular video editor was CapCut, and the most spent on YouTube.
And the number of applications downloads and users’ spending showed a significant increase in the period from January to November 2021.
The number of downloads has increased by 8%, reaching 140 billion. User spending in apps has also increased significantly, by 25%, to a record $135 billion.
Such data was published by the analytical company App Annie, which presented a report on the mobile app market in 2021.
In 2021, the global economy emerged from lockdown and began a post-pandemic recovery.
"Will such a "return to physical" growth of the economy slow down? Absolutely not," the authors of the report say.
India is the leader in the number of applications downloaded, with about 20% of all downloads.
The United States (9%) and Brazil (8%) follow.
iOS users spent more than Android users: 65% of all app spending was on iOS.
Among the applications, CapCut, a video editor, took first place in the number of downloads in 2021.
It is followed by two Indian apps - video-sharing app MX TakaTak and the e-commerce app Meesho.
Telegram also ranks in the top 10 in terms of the number of downloads.
In general, judging by the number of downloads, VPN services are popular among users (two of them are in the top-10 - VPN Master and NightOwl VPN) and video-related services (besides CapCut and MX TakaTak, there are two more such services in the top-10 - Moj and SnackVideo).
"The most money was spent on apps for live broadcasts and online streaming," the authors of the report noted.
YouTube leads the pack, with TikTok, Disney+, HBO Max, and Piccoma, a Japanese manga subscription service, all in the top five in terms of user spending.
The first places in the number of monthly active users are Telegram, Instagram, Zoom and TikTok, and the fifth place is occupied by the mobile version of Microsoft Office.
In Russia, the leader in the number of uploads per year was the shopping app AliExpress.
Following it are the services Zenly and CapCut, which show where your friends are.
The top 10 apps include: StarMaker, an online karaoke app; Shein, an online fashion retailer; Maps for Minecraft Pocket Edition; DiDi, an online taxi-hailing service; Pure Tuber, a YouTube client; Dicos, an online grocery store; and Samok, an online supermarket.
People around the world have adapted to the pandemic by moving to a mobile-first way of life, which can be considered one of the main takeaways.
The industries that have seen the greatest success have been those that have helped people connect, both virtually and in person," App Annie's head of marketing research, Lexi Sidow, commented.
Mobile gaming revenue reached $90 billion in 2021, with the leaders in downloads being casual and hypercasual games, which have no or almost no storyline, and minimal video effects.
The top three most popular games in the world are Count Masters, Project Makeover and Bridge Race.
In Russia, DOP 2: Delete One Part, Going Balls and Phone Case DIY are the most popular games.
Previously, App Annie released its forecast for 2022.
Among the main trends for next year, the company's analysts named the growth of the number of TikTok users to 1.5 billion, the popularity of Generation Z financial applications, such as the investment app Robinhood, and the continued growth in popularity of metaverse mobile games.
Clan De File dog food for dogs with beef, 30 pieces, 40 g each.
Natural, air-dried dog treats for all breeds and ages made from beef.
Clan De File is dog meat with beef, and nothing else.
All-natural dried dog treats for all breeds and ages.
Only one type of protein is used in the preparation - beef.
This reduces the risk of food allergies, and therefore treats are suitable for dogs with sensitive stomachs and prone to allergic reactions.
The main ingredient of the product is meat filleted according to human grade quality standards, which are used in the preparation of food for humans - human grade.
Recommended daily ration: no more than 10% of the adult animal's daily ration.
Energy value: 407 kcal.
Ingredients: beef fillet.
Nutritional value: protein 57%, fat 17%, ash 4%, moisture 20%.
Russians warned of new scam scheme
The attackers began to look for new ways to commit fraud in video messages.
Izvestia writes about this with reference to experts.
According to Ivideon’s Director of Products Zaur Abutaliyev, the main danger associated with the spread of video communication tools is diplopia.
In this case, the scammers create a fake video based on real recordings of the victim.
Thanks to this, the neural network is able to accurately reproduce the features of the behavior of a particular person.
Abutaliyev added that using a diplomatic pouch, the perpetrators can call the victim's contacts via video call or create a video with a copy of the person to send out to blackmail.
"Such hoaxes could easily provoke bullying, as a skilled perpetrator could put people into embarrassing, dangerous or compromising scenarios," the expert said.
Varonis senior systems engineer Alexander Vetkol also noted that psychologically, people are more likely to trust others when they can see them.
He stressed that this could create specific risks in the event of video-based technologies.
David, I'll add.
In what I wrote above, I focused on the fact that all this I bought in a small town, where the local mentality did not allow to dress up and walk in short skirts, show socks and knickers on the feet.
It's a province, but there was a product in the store.
In big cities and in Muslim countries, women would dye their hair and show off their legs.
This is how it is in Dushanbe, it is a large city, the capital of the republic.
There are plenty of make-up artists, but none of the same make-up.
Five actions to help avoid diabetes
High blood sugar levels are one of the most common problems in the world.
However, some do not attach much importance to this and are right to do so.
Diabetes can lead to serious complications and even death.
Preventive measures play a major role in preventing the development of diseases.
For example, doctors recommend changing the diet - reducing the number of various drinks and switching to plain water positively affects metabolism.
Sugary foods raise blood sugar levels to dangerous levels when eaten in excess.
Therefore, the first step on the path to a healthy lifestyle is to stop buying sweets and keep them at home.
The disease is not only affected by improper nutrition, but also by habits.
To reduce the risk of diabetes, you need to move more.
Experts recommend following a low-carb diet.
Such a diet not only helps to lose weight, but also protects against sharp fluctuations in sugar levels.
To protect against diabetes, you need to eat a lot of fiber.
Fibre-rich foods fill the stomach and thus promote feelings of satiety, the release of digestive juices and the absorption of food.
Tomato seeds GAVRISH Pink Bush F1 0.10 g, article number 4241014.
A low-growing, early-maturing, high-yielding bi-tomato for open-field and temporary plastic tunnel production.
The plant is determinate, with short internodes.
The fruit is large, pink in colour, quite dense, weighing 180-210 g and protected from sunburn by leaves, which store well.
The meat is juicy, with a sweet taste.
The hybrid is resistant to a disease complex.
It is recommended for salads, appetizers and slicing.
Sowing in the nursery: end of March - beginning of April.
The peak is in the first true leaf stage.
Planting out the seedlings in the polytunnels is in May.
After planting in the open ground, the plant forms and ties.
MK Slavda FC-160.
This freezer has an A energy efficiency class, which means that it consumes significantly less electricity during operation.
The freezer is ideal for both a private home and an apartment thanks to the use of high-quality, low-noise compressors and excellent sound insulation.
The camera is no louder than a regular refrigerator.
The quick freeze function freezes the products in the shortest possible time and preserves the maximum amount of nutrients.
The Slavda FC-160 dehumidifier has a climate class of N/ST, which means it can operate without problems at temperatures up to +38 degrees.
A digital control panel with automatic temperature control.
Doctor Pavlova told about the “daytime migraine” of the workaholics
Several factors can contribute to worsening symptoms over the weekend
The reason for the worsening of the patient’s condition after working hours is often a “weekend migraine”, endocrinologist, candidate of medical sciences, senior research associate of the Department of Fundamental Medicine of the Moscow State University, Head of the Clinic of System Medicine of Zukhra Pavlova wrote in her Telegram channel.
According to her, it is especially common for workaholics to suffer from this, who experience headaches, dizziness, and weakness on weekends.
Doctor Pavlova noted that in addition to the accumulated fatigue during the week there are plenty of objective reasons for the negative reaction of the body to the change in conditions.
On the weekend, our lives change completely.
"We sleep long, all day we lie on the sofa, probably we eat more and drink less - the doctor argued. "Because of the lack of coffee, there is a small break.
Due to overeating and lack of water - heavy and broken."
The late surge is also important.
For example, if you get up three hours later than usual, you'll get a reaction called jet lag.
It affects travelers who cross several time zones.
To determine which of the factors is playing a decisive role in the worsening of the patient's condition, Pavlova recommended tracking what changes the most on weekends.
Mattress Benartti Optimal Hard S1000 130x185.
The reinforced perimeter of high-density foam significantly increases the service life of the mattress.
The "Optimal Hard S1000" mattress with different firmness levels, the total height of the mattress is 23 cm.
The maximum load per sleeping place is 140 kg.
The mattress is based on the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is located in its own tissue pocket, which allows for the correct distribution of body weight.
An insulating layer of felt has been added to the spring block for added protection.
On one side of the mattress there is a layer of coconut coir, 2 cm thick, which provides additional firmness and durability to the mattress.
A cotton jacquard, printed on artificial leather of 2 cm thickness and Hollcon 1 cm material, which provides additional comfort.
On the other hand, the mattress has a layer of coconut coir 1 cm thick and a layer of wool.
The fabric was treated with a special antibacterial Sanitized (Switzerland) treatment.
The impregnation provides complete destruction of mould spores, prevents the development of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress comes with four easy-to-use handles for turning, and aerators for additional ventilation.
South African scientists say Pfizer vaccine against omicron is low-efficacy
South Africa says Pfizer's Covid-19 vaccine against omicron is ineffective
South African scientists have conducted a study and reported low efficacy of the Pfizer vaccine against the omicron strain of the coronavirus.
According to estimates, it (the level of neutralization of "omicron") corresponds to (the level of) vaccine efficacy of 22.5% against symptomatic infection, which is why... the vaccine's ability to protect against infection is called into question, the text of the study published on the MedRxiv portal says.
The specialists clarified that the drug can save from a severe course of the disease.
Earlier, the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that the omicron strain of the coronavirus could cause a new wave of the pandemic in the UK with more hospitalizations than a year ago.
How much hidden sugar is in common foods?
Sugar is not a good source of nutrients.
Its excess in the diet can lead to type 2 diabetes, as well as cardiovascular and cancer diseases.
Consumers should be aware that a hidden sugar may be listed as an ingredient in a product, an ingredient that is similar in energy value, composition and glycemic index to sugar.
The label may contain several dozen names, in essence, referring to sugar.
Some of the most common and frequent names are glucose and fructose.
Other sugars that can be used include dextrose (corn sugar), levulose (fruit sugar), molasses (blackstrap molasses), agave syrup, and the like.
These are all simple sugars, which belong to the monosaccharides and disaccharides, and they can be found not only in confectionery, but also in ketchup, doctor's sausage, bread, etc.
Roskachestvo says that the most effective way to reduce sugar consumption is to eat whole, unprocessed foods and to pay attention to labels and the many different names for sugar.
Different types of sugar differ in taste, but whatever the ingredient is called in the product - syrup or nectar, processed or unprocessed, brown or white - it is still sugar.
It is difficult to calculate the exact amount of sugar, as it is necessary to take into account not only the amount of sugar stated by the manufacturer on the packaging, but also the fact that vegetables, fruits and other things contain a certain amount of sugar.
As a result, the total amount of sugar may be significantly higher than indicated on the label.
German Chancellor Scholz: Gas will lose importance for Germany in 25 years
Germany's new Chancellor Olaf Scholz said that the import of gas is becoming less important for Germany as the country continues its transition to a decarbonised economy.
According to him, Germany plans to completely abandon gas, oil and coal by 2045, becoming a climate-neutral country.
"In 25 years' time, the question of transporting gas to Germany and Europe will play a different role," the chancellor said.
Scholz noted that Germany continues to be committed to the fact that Ukraine will continue to transport Russian natural gas in the future, as this resource is currently of great importance for the energy transition.
He recalled that Germany and the United States had made a statement in which Berlin's support for Ukraine's energy transformation was recorded.
Earlier, German Foreign Minister Annalena Baerbock said that the certification process for the Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline is ongoing.
According to the minister, during the coalition negotiations and the coalition agreement, it was stated that European energy law should be applied to energy projects.
The diplomat also noted that the pipeline "does not meet the requirements" of the European Union.
Thanks for the interesting photos!
In 1985, it was necessary to travel to those regions.
I remember the CMEZ rising from Kanatchkovo station up the hill, past the old building (similar to a centralizing post, two-story), along Kanatchkovo Street, and turning right onto Ulica Vavilova, to the factory gates...
Hackers break into Twitter account of Indian PM
Hackers have breached the Twitter account of Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi.
The attackers managed to publish a fake message.
It was reported that India allegedly recognized Bitcoin as a legitimate payment method, and that the country had already purchased cryptocurrency.
At Modi's office, they told me to ignore new messages.
The Prime Minister's office said Twitter reacted quickly - the account was restored.
The page of India's Prime Minister was already hacked in 2020 and asked for donations through cryptocurrency.
A referendum in New Caledonia saw a majority vote against independence
In New Caledonia, the third referendum, held on 12 December, ended with the same result as the previous two.
According to the first partial results announced on Sunday, December 12, at noon, a majority of New Caledonians voted against their territory's independence during the referendum.
Turnout in this third vote was significantly lower than in the previous two.
Preliminary results published by local authorities showed that 3.51% (2,755) voted in favour of New Caledonia's independence from France, while 96.49% (75,762) voted against.
Turnout was 43.90%, with more than 80,000 New Caledonian residents voting.
As reported by France-Presse news agency, "the outcome of these elections left no room for doubt," as independence supporters urged voters not to vote.
As initiators of the referendum, they have come out against its holding on December 12, considering that a new outbreak of the COVID-19 epidemic on the archipelago prevents a full and "honest" election campaign.
This abstention thus opened the way to a third victory for the supporters of French New Caledonia, after the referendums held in November 2018 and October 2020.
In 2018, 56.7% of the population voted against independence, and in 2020, 53.3%.
The separatists said they would not recognise the results of the latest vote and would challenge them at the United Nations.
As reported on Sunday, December 12, at the Elysee Palace, French President Emmanuel Macron is expected to address the results of this referendum.
The issue of New Caledonia's independence has largely revived the French presidential campaign in recent weeks.
Several presidential candidates have spoken in favour of the territory remaining in France, as it is "the last EU presence in the Pacific Ocean."
"New Caledonia must remain French," repeatedly insisted Eric Zemmour.
The Republican candidate Valérie Pécresse, who published a column in Le Figaro at the end of October, called on the Caledonians to remain French.
For his part, Emmanuel Macron announced in May 2018 that he would not take a position "because it is not his responsibility."
However, the president added: "France would be less beautiful without New Caledonia."
Prime Minister Jean Castex, for his part, expressed "a strong desire for the Scottish referendum to be a French referendum."
Hey, what's up!
I've been a little... I've been a little mean to you, I'm still a little awkward, I'm sorry.
Thanks for not turning away from my channel.
On the subject: I'm not an artist, I love to draw, but the result is inspired menstrual blood.
But as an artist - not as an artist: what can be changed here?
Just remember that the food was NATURAL, so obesity wasn't as common as it is now.
But medicine was useless - leeches, garlic and decoctions.
Now, they would have put him on his feet right away.
And the food is completely irrelevant.
Turkey tested the world's first drone with a laser weapon
The first in the world drone with a laser weapon passed successful tests in Turkey.
The UAV “Eren” was tested at a distance of 100 to 500 meters, reports “MIR24”.
The device is capable of neutralizing explosive objects at a distance using a laser.
The new model’s maximum flight altitude is 3,000 m.
After passing the relevant tests, the UAV will be put into service with the Turkish military, which will use it to destroy explosive devices without the need for sappers.
The agency stresses that Turkey is one of six countries in the world capable of developing and producing its own drones.
I butchered the steaks.
Salt, sugar, black pepper and nutmeg.
Sometimes, he added, it wasn't a problem.
In a deep bowl, he covered it with a plate.
Well, anyway.
And why should I pay for this sturgeon, I don't know what it is, but the sturgeon is a great fish for the money.
Bread, butter, and pumpkin.
A soggy sandwich.
WSJ readers criticize Russia-U.S. relations piece
Readers of The Wall Street Journal criticized a column by Professor Christopher Hartwell, in which he described his view of the U.S.-Russia relationship.
The author expressed concern that the West was allegedly sacrificing Ukraine to Russia.
In his article, he convinces the readers of the danger that comes from Moscow and made a number of insulting remarks about the Russian president Vladimir Putin.
At the end of the meeting, Hartwell called on the West to "stand together as one front against Russia."
WSJ readers expressed their disagreement with the professor's position.
“There is a lot of false information in this article”, one of the readers quotes RIA Novosti.
"Europe is not ours to lose, and Ukraine is not our land.
The United States and NATO allies will never go to war with Russia over Ukraine," another said.
Patches can also be applied to the lips.
The Dearboo Peach & Hibiscus Brightening Hydrogel Eye Patch is a high-tech hydrogel that provides high absorption and delivers highly concentrated natural plant essence to the skin, which adheres closely to the skin and gives a feeling of freshness.
When nutrients are delivered to the skin, the hydrogel minimises the accompanying loss of moisture and allows the essence to penetrate deep into the skin.
SONEX 2085/EL ceiling fan with LED Nores
The NORES 2085/EL series luminaire consists of a metal base (base) and a plastic diffuser.
The diffuser is made of high-quality white matte acrylic, which ensures even light diffusion and good light transmission.
The ceiling is in the shape of a square, in the form of a relief ornament with a geometric pattern, decorated with transparent dots that create a beautiful effect of "star twinkle" and refraction.
The IP43 degree of protection allows the luminaire to be used in certain areas of wet rooms.
The kit includes a replaceable LED module with lenses, with a power of 72 watts, which corresponds to a 520-watt incandescent lamp.
And also a dimmer, with which you can smoothly change the color temperature from 3000 to 6000K, change the brightness, switch to the warm/white/cold/night light mode.
Urjazh Mask for the face is a moisturizing thermal night 50 ml.
An ultra-hydrating night mask for all skin types with a fresh, rested and glowing complexion in the morning!
The real "thermal bath" for dehydrated skin!
It tones, smooths and restores the skin's barrier.
A very pleasant water-gel texture with no stickiness.
A great way to care for your skin after active sun exposure!
It is hypoallergenic.
An earthquake of magnitude 5.2 occurred in the Kuril Islands
A magnitude 5.2 earthquake struck near the Kuril Island of Shikotan.
It is noted that the earthquake's epicenter was located 231.8 km northeast of the city of Severo-Kurilsk.
The epicenter was at a depth of 92.5 km.
Earlier, seismologists recorded an earthquake of magnitude 7.5 in Peru, in which ten people were injured.
If he had been born into a poor American family and tried to make his way in the world, who knows where his petit-bourgeois mind would have taken him.
It's good when you come to America as a known person.
And if you were born there, you would fight for no other reason.
So it was a waste of time to water the dirt, the filth and the poison of the building, which no one has yet invented a more just.
Ukraine will start producing new generation of air-to-air missiles
The new Ukrainian-Turkish plant will start to create the reactive unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs) type ANKA.
On December 11, an anonymous adviser to the head of the Ukrainian president’s office, Oleksiy Arestovich, reported this.
That is, they are capable of acting against air objects, against other unmanned vehicles.
Even against piloted aircraft.
They will be equipped with Ukrainian engines and the rest of the Turkish avionics: the body and so on," Dialog.ua quotes him.
Commenting on the main features of the ANKA UAVs, Arestovich explained that they are jet-powered, not propeller-driven UAVs.
According to him, this new generation of drones after Bayraktar surpasses him in all respects.
The first batch of UAVs should be produced by the plant at the end of the next year, Arestovich concluded.
The ANKA UAV was developed by the Turkish Aerospace Institute in February 2014.
The unmanned aircraft was developed by Turkish authorities in cooperation with a number of private companies since 2010.
The Ukrainian General Staff has declassified data on the use of Bayraktar drones and Javelin missile systems in the joint forces’ military operations in Donbas.
On December 6, President of Ukraine Volodymyr Zelensky reported that the construction of a plant for the production of modern military unmanned aerial vehicles had begun in the country.
According to him, Ukraine intends to use drones.
On September 29, Bayraktar Defense and the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense signed an agreement on the construction of a center in the Kiev region, where personnel training, as well as tests and maintenance of Turkish Bayraktar UAVs will be conducted.
The press service of the Ukrainian leader called the memorandum "a big real step forward."
Two lions escaped from a container at the airport
Lions escaped from Changi Airport in Singapore.
This is reported by The Straits Times.
Two of the predators managed to escape from a container with seven lions that had arrived on one of the planes.
The publication notes that it is unknown from which country they were brought to Singapore, and where they were headed.
One of the escaped lions landed on the roof of a container.
They couldn't get close to him because of the protective fence.
The standoff ended after the arrival of staff from the Mandai Wildlife Group, which manages all of Singapore's zoos.
They have immobilized the lions with tranquilizer darts and plan to deliver them to a quarantine facility.
Previously, it was reported that a lion escaped from its owner in Phnom Penh, the capital of Cambodia.
On the same day, the beast voluntarily returned home, and no one was hurt.
Experts warn of cancer risk from B9 vitamin
Research suggests that an excess of vitamin B9, also known as folic acid, can lead to cancer.
The Daily Express has warned about this.
Experts say there is strong evidence that people who are not deficient in folic acid are less likely to develop certain types of cancer, in particular colorectal cancer.
However, exceeding the necessary dose actually promotes the growth of cancer cells.
University of Alabama Birmingham professor of nutrition Beth Kitchin advises keeping track of the amount of folic acid consumed throughout the day.
The optimal dose is 400 micrograms per day.
Cancer risk increases only if you significantly deviate from this figure in either direction.
Kitchin recommends not taking B9 vitamins in tablets without a doctor's recommendation, to check the dosage and to avoid milk and milk products, which contain folic acid.
Previously, dietitian Rachel Fine called folate a substance that slows aging.
Since it is, among other things, an avocado, Fein recommended that men over 50 eat this fruit more often.
In the UK, by April, about 75,000 people may die due to the omikron strain
British scientists predict that due to the spread of the omicron strain of the coronavirus in the next five months, up to 75,000 people may die in England, if the restrictions are not tightened in the winter.
The Guardian reported this citing a study by experts from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM).
According to the most optimistic forecast of experts who are part of the Emergency Situation Advisory Group at the British Ministry of the Cabinet, by April 2022, more than 25,000 deaths from the Omicron strain will be recorded in the country, and more than 175,000 patients will be hospitalized.
At the peak of the outbreak, the hospitals will be treating more than 2,000 infected people every day.
"Serious measures to control the coronavirus may be needed to prevent the National Health Service being overwhelmed if the omicron strain turns out to be more infectious than the delta variant and existing vaccines cannot prevent infection," said mathematician Rosanna Barnard from the LSHTM.
Previously, the UK Health Security Agency said that if the rate of spread of the Omicron strain remained at its current level, there would be around 1 million cases of infection by the end of the year.
By the middle of December, the Omikron strain may become dominant in the United Kingdom.
Currently, 1,898 cases of infection with the Omicron strain of the coronavirus have been detected in the UK, of which 633 have been detected in the last 24 hours.
At the same time, on December 9, the head of the British Ministry of Health, Sajid Javid, stated that in reality, the figure could already reach 10,000 cases.
I wanted to write a smart comment, but I read up to this point:
"The damages suffered by the unfortunate animal and his employment in a second job as a result of the incredible suffering he endured."
And it crashed down on top of me!
Turns out the "poor creature" is my husband, and I thought a squirrel!
The last knight on this planet.
Richard Craig, judging by the dislikes, is speaking in a way that most people can't understand.
What were you trying to say - that those on Instagram are pretending or they are all successful, as there is no point in pretending?
The surplus is like a warehouse of stuff that didn't make it out in time.
If you're looking to dig deep and find something worthwhile, there's something to be found in the trash.
You just have to be patient and clearly understand what you're looking for.
The demand for superyachts has grown by a quarter in the world
The construction of super yachts this year and orders for next year are breaking all records, despite calls to reduce the carbon footprint and combat climate change.
The world fleet of yachts has 1200 units, which is four times more than last year.
In the era of climate change, it is hard to imagine that the number of people willing and able to spend £50 million-plus on a floating palace will not dwindle, writes the Guardian.
However, they are becoming more and more.
This year, orders are up 25% over last year.
Brokers say there has not been such a frenzy in the market in 20 years.
The first reason is that many who can afford a yacht fear contracting the disease on land and prefer to avoid the pandemic on board their own vessel.
The second reason is also related to the coronavirus.
Previously, all these people would go to the office and meet with business partners in person, but now the absolute majority of them work remotely, and negotiations are conducted by phone.
Broker Will Christie told the paper that shipyards are taking orders for new yachts up to 2025.
This means that customers are willing to pay more, as long as their yacht is ready at least one or two years earlier.
"People just want freedom, and the super-rich can afford it," he says.
In western society, many criticise such behaviour and call it decadent.
The rich, sociologists say, do not want to understand that in the age of space travel, yacht holidays and flying one's own plane, the elite does not want to share the blame for climate change with the rest of humanity.
Economists are urging governments to act and are proposing new taxes and rules for the super-rich, though they recognise it will be extremely difficult to implement given the mobile nature of money.
However, only the number of super yachts ordered is impressive, but also their characteristics.
Of the 1,200 ships, 27 have a length of bow above 100 metres.
The Norwegian billionaire Rekke is building the 183-meter yacht REV Ocean.
After launch, it will be the largest yacht in the world.
The yacht has a "lunar pool" and a submarine designed to explore the seabed.
Existing superyachts have helicopter pads, open-air cinemas and wrestling platforms, and Richard Wilk, a professor of economic anthropology at Indiana University, says that compared with the total amount of greenhouse gas emissions, the carbon footprint of a superyacht is negligible.
But it has symbolic value, given that there are only about 2,000 billionaires in the world.
This is just another example of the extreme overconsumption of a very small group of people.
Scientists found that the emissions footprint of the world's billionaires is thousands of times greater than that of the average person on the planet.
If one person produces on average 5 tonnes of CO2 per year, then the planet's biggest polluter, Roman Abramovich, is responsible for 33.9 tonnes of greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere in 2018.
Two-thirds of the emission trail was hidden on his 162.5-metre (533-foot) yacht, the Eclipse.
Even if the owner is not on board the yacht, the crew continues to poison the planet.
The owner can call the captain and give the order to tow the yacht, for example, from the Mediterranean to the Caribbean.
The superyacht owners are not sympathetic when they complain through YouTube that their giant ships have nowhere to berth.
It is also difficult to understand her call to build marinas for ships of 50 metres.
Dangerous weekly alcohol dose linked to bowel cancer
American scientists have determined how much alcohol in a week increases the risk of developing cancer.
This is reported by the Daily Express.
Experts concluded that drinking four or more units of alcohol a week is linked to an increased risk of cancer.
At the same time, the risk of developing the disease increases with the amount of alcohol consumed.
Moreover, moderate drinkers are at greater risk of developing colorectal cancer than women.
The exact cause of this type of cancer is unknown, but researchers have noted that certain factors lead to a harmful process for the body.
Thanks to the author for the worthy material and photo.
Sergey, I see nothing wrong with egoism and pride.
Just as you can't see the egocentrism and vanity in the cuckold who seeks a free surrogate mother to burden her with expenses and responsibility, while he enjoys the title of father from a safe distance.
Why they work in the ministry, they have a place in the circus.
I understand that everything should have been done with royal pomp, but the model is very over-the-top.
It's hard to imagine Diana being shoved into a car, let alone any kind of travel.
I was 12 years old and I remember watching it on TV.
It seemed that almost every girl dreamed of being a princess in a beautiful, fancy dress, and I was no exception.
But looking at that dress, I changed my mind about being a princess.
Dogs can understand words and phrases at the level of a two-year-old child
Many, or rather all dog lovers are convinced that these creatures are very smart.
But even they don't realize how advanced the quadrupedal pets really are.
For many years, biologists have conducted various experiments to find out for sure how intelligent animals are.
Although a dog's vocabulary is not as extensive as a human's, a new study has shown that a dog can respond to 89 words or phrases.
The researchers' findings were published in Sciencealert.
Dogs can't play chess or write poetry, they know nothing of politics, economics, or the arts, yet they often manage to fool their owners.
Experts believe that representatives of some breeds show the best results in understanding human language words, but statistical data for drawing accurate conclusions is not yet available.
For example, some breeds are traditionally considered canine geniuses - for example, labradors.
Scientists have concluded that dogs are capable of logical thought, and are on a par with a two-year-old child in terms of their ability to learn.
Dreamline Dream Massage TFK 80x200 mattress.
The mattress is made of an independent spring block TFK with natural latex and coconut coir.
This mattress is made on the basis of an independent TFK block.
It's a modern, 512-independent-coil sleep system.
Each spring is contained in its own pouch and does not affect its neighbors.
In this way, the load on the mattress is distributed as evenly as possible.
The person takes on a natural form during sleep.
The springs for strength are insulated from the upper layers of the thermal blanket.
On top of the wool felt are layers of natural latex and coconut, which have excellent and beautiful properties.
One side is covered with a thin layer of natural seven-zone latex.
This natural filler has 7 comfort zones, helps to perceive one's own weight, has a light massage effect.
The Antistress cover is made of velveteen, which is 250 g/m2 thick.
It is pleasant to the touch and externally, it has calming, relaxing properties.
Sova, a shining example, is deep-sea explorer Taumaitian Axel.
Some of his victims are so great that they cause the killer to die.
It simply can't swallow them, and its teeth won't let it spit out too much of the prey back into the water.
If you don't care about the fate of your property in the amount of four objects, then why did you decide that your objects are interesting to someone and they will be glad of them?
Today, the law does allow you to manage your property.
Do it yourself if you don't like how others do it.
Ukraine prepared for the US-Russia trade war
The US and Russia will “trade” over Ukraine’s entry into NATO, said analyst Alexander Kochetkov in his article for the publication “Vzglyad”.
He says Washington and Moscow are planning to resume talks on U.S. guarantees that Ukraine will not join the North Atlantic Treaty Organization, despite the words of U.S. President Joe Biden about the right of countries to "go wherever they want."
If you are offered something that is obviously unacceptable, say, selling a close relative into sexual slavery, you don't haggle, you just walk away.
And with regard to Ukraine, a deal is in the offing," the analyst wrote.
Kochetkov added that Russia does not plan to attack Ukraine and is seeking dialogue with Kiev.
"Training is conducted in secret, quickly and immediately moves to offensive actions, not waiting for the grouping to be discovered and to deploy forces of counteraction," he noted.
China encourages the development of the railway transportation industry
Cutting-edge Chinese technologies attracted the attention of companies from the United States, Germany, France and other countries at the 2021 China International Railway Transport and Equipment Manufacturing Exhibition held in Zhuzhou, Hunan Province, Central China.
The main technologies developed by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co. Ltd. allow trains to automatically detect and diagnose technical faults, said Hou Zhaowei of the company.
High-speed trains running on the China-Laos Railway, which was put into operation at the beginning of this month, are already equipped with these technologies, which will ensure increased reliability and operability of the rolling stock.
In the past six months, China has significantly increased its exports of railway vehicles, and many countries in Asia and Europe are witnessing the "Chinese speed."
In May this year, the first two-story high-speed electric trains developed in China rolled off the production line of CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd. for export to Europe.
With a maximum speed of 200 km/h, the trains will run on the Austrian, German, Hungarian and other European railways.
In November, the trial operation of the metro train developed by the aforementioned company for Turkey began.
The train will run along the metro line connecting the centre of Istanbul with the city's airport.
The line will open next year.
It will be the fastest metro line in Turkey with a speed of 120 km/h.
"China's railway equipment manufacturing industry is one of the industries with the highest level of innovation and the strongest international innovation competitiveness," said Feng Yajian, head of the Trade and Investment Department of the China Council for the Promotion of International Trade (CCPIT).
"This industry is the main competitive advantage of Chinese high-end equipment manufacturing in the world market," Fan Yajian said.
After more than 60 years of hard work, China has created a leading system for the production of railway equipment, with a complete set of supporting facilities and large-scale production.
According to Feng Yajian, the country ranks first in the level of electrification of railways and in the operating mileage of high-speed and urban railways.
The biologist listed early signs of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semen Goloshayev in an interview with the radio station Sputnik listed the early signs of dementia.
According to him, the signs of future dementia may include forgetfulness, as well as a whole range of mild cognitive impairments, such as the inability to concentrate, plan, and reduce the level of abstract thinking.
Hearing loss is currently being discussed as both an early sign of Alzheimer's disease and a risk factor for its development, a specialist said.
Golushchik stressed that the causes of dementia can be neurodegenerative diseases, head injuries, some infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
He added that Alzheimer's disease and atherosclerosis of the brain's blood vessels were the most common causes of this syndrome.
The biologist noted that at present, doctors do not know effective ways of treating dementia.
Therefore, it is necessary to start its prevention in time.
According to him, learning foreign languages and active communication will help to reduce the risk of dementia.
The WHO also recommends maintaining moderate physical activity, regularly exercising cognitive skills with games and hobbies that require intense engagement of memory and logical thinking
“There are recommendations for the use of various BAs, but their effectiveness and expediency are still being discussed in the scientific community,” Goloshchakin said.
"The World Health Organization recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical activity, regular training of cognitive skills and abilities through games and hobbies that require intensive involvement of memory and logical thinking," said Goloshakin.
Previously, a UK dementia research charity has said the disease is increasingly affecting people in their 40s.
The doctors said the early symptoms of Alzheimer's disease.
The first warning sign can be vision problems, which make it difficult for the patient to recognize objects.
Another sign of developing dyslexia, experts said, is aphasia - a condition in which a person cannot find the right words to convey what he wants to say.
The neurologist demanded that Saakashvili be sent abroad for treatment
Former President of Georgia Mikheil Saakashvili needs psychiatric treatment and rehabilitation abroad, said neurologist Otar Toidezi, who is part of the medical advisory board established by the Georgian ombudsman.
His neurological status is the leading cause of his illness.
The stable problems are mobility, coordination, and character variability," the specialist said, noting that this does not go beyond the norm and now the former president needs to be sent to a special rehabilitation facility.
"We call this neurorehabilitation and psychoneurorehabilitation, which we do not have in Georgia," Toidze said, demanding that Saakashvili be treated in a specialized facility that does not exist in Georgia.
On the evening of 7 December, Saakashvili began to sabotage the provision of medical care after the penitentiary service staff subjected him to disciplinary punishment.
The Georgian politician managed to quickly remove the punishment and restore himself to his previous rights.
Aleksandra, "Are you also taking money for this?" - I'm interested to know where such people come from...
To pay for bread in a bakery is normal, but to pay for a tutor's work is not?
Or are we so holy that we feed on air?
There is another side to the medal.
These people are parasites on the body of society.
They don't work, they don't pay taxes, they live on benefits and off their relatives.
They also receive full medical care.
How many mouths can a working man feed?
We feed all the alcoholics, drug addicts who have also lost their health because of their stupidity.
Then we'll be surprised by the extension of the retirement age.
The money could have been spent on treating actual sick people.
Of course, the Red Flag of Victory will forever remain in the history of our country and it should not be confused with the state one.
The red flag has a reverse side, it is a symbol of the communist movement, so it will never be a state.
It is time for the author to stop writing provocative articles, it is time to get angry red and start living a normal life, not the past.
Protests against COVID passports took place in Spain
Protests against the mandatory COVID-19 vaccination certificate took place in the Spanish cities of Barcelona and Valencia, Europa Press reports.
In the Catalan capital, the number of participants in the action was approximately 3,000.
In Barcelona, COVID passports have become mandatory to enter bars, restaurants, sports facilities, retirement homes and night-time entertainment venues.
Many of the protesters came to the action without masks.
Their posters accused the state of totalitarianism and called for respect for the will of the people.
In Valencia, a vaccination certificate will also be required to enter entertainment venues and restaurants with more than 50 seats.
Protesters in this city have declared a medical dictatorship, and the vaccination has been called an experiment.
In Spain, more than 5.2 million cases of coronavirus infection have been detected since the beginning of the pandemic, more than 88,000 patients have died.
Restrictions are also planned for the unvaccinated in Russia.
Government bills on a unified QR code system were submitted to the State Duma on November 12.
It is assumed that Russians will be able to visit places of mass events, cultural institutions, public catering and retail outlets with the presentation of either a vaccination certificate or a certificate of a previous illness, or a vaccination certificate.
The same rules will be established for train and air travel.
Tradizione Anthracite 26 cm cast iron with glass lid.
The coating is cast iron with an anti-corrosive coating of Antracite TM Tradition.
The pot is designed for daily use in the home.
The exceptional strength and durability of the anti-slip coating, equal to that of natural stone, has been specially developed for intensive use every day.
Thick-walled cast-iron body.
A five-layer anti-corrosive coating system of the latest generation.
Premium coverage reinforced with mineral particles.
Two layers of extra defence against the suburbs.
Has good non-stick properties for healthy cooking without butter or oil.
At least 4000 cycles of preparation, in accordance with the rules of operation.
Suitable for all types of tiles, except induction.
GOST R 51162-2019.
The guarantee for each item is 4 years (provided that the rules for operation are followed - 4 years for the body and 1 year for the anti-corrosive coating).
They do not contain PFOA, LEAD, CADMIUM.
Cast iron skillets and grills can be used in the oven without a glass lid.
Easy to wash.
It makes sense that the virus is constantly mutating.
If a person is healthy and rarely gets sick (once or twice a year with the common cold), then his immunity is normal.
Immunomodulators are not recommended for prophylaxis in any case.
Immunity is supported by a healthy diet and lifestyle plus exercise.
In this case, vaccination against the flu and this coronavirus is pointless.
The 3M 5925 particulate filter.
FFP2 degree of protection, 2 pieces.
Article No. 713946.
FFP2 respirator filter for 3M 6000, 3M 7500 and full-face masks 3M.
Protects the user's respiratory tract from various airborne substances.
Creates a reliable barrier against infectious particles.
This filter is designed for operation in conditions where the concentration of harmful substances in the ambient air exceeds the permissible value.
The filter can be used to protect against bacteria/viruses, for example, with essential oils and other antibacterial agents.
FFP2 masks have a PD value greater than 0.05 mg/m3, with a maximum contaminant concentration of 12 times the PD value.
This class of respirators can retain at least 94% of harmful substances.
The pre-filters are attached to the gas masks with the 3M 501 holder.
Features: low resistance to breathing.
It is not difficult to see.
Compatible with 3M 6000 and 3M 7500 half-mask respirators, as well as full facepiece respirators.
Compatibility with other PPE required in difficult working conditions is ensured.
The "constitutional monarch" eyes, it seems, have not only me.
And this family PR - kids, dad...
Reva seemed to me to be some kind of nothing.
Only knew that Zaitsev was annoying - Zaitsev and Zaitsev.
Well, I found out, said a few times, and shut up, let my mate have a go, that's why we fought.
A steep climb: how Chinese are becoming skiers
The Olympics will bring millions to the slopes and help create world-class resorts in the country
China hopes that the Olympics will not only attract 300 million citizens to take up winter sports, which will help President Xi Jinping collect 1 trillion yuan, but will also help to boost the economic development of lagging remote provinces.
The ski resort Taiwuo in Zhangjiakou, which is located near the venue of the Winter Olympics, is becoming more and more popular with Chinese people.
In addition to building infrastructure, landscaping work is also being carried out: workers plant trees.
There are more than 700 ski resorts in the country, but only 20 of them are large enough to host international competitions.
In many regions of China where resorts are located, including Zhangjiakou, there are problems with snow.
The main task for the long-term perspective is to provide comfortable and interesting holidays in Chinese resorts, so that all newcomers become regular visitors.
However, this is still a long way off.
Games adviser Justin Downs says the Chinese ski industry has changed beyond recognition since his last visit in 2007.
More and more Chinese are heading to the slopes every winter.
Fiona, a snowboarder from Beijing, is one of them.
Despite the major changes, it will take many more years to create a ski culture here, says Downs.
Many resorts are located in agricultural and mining areas.
These regions are yet to be actively developed and create the necessary infrastructure for recreation.
70-year-old Gao Makong lives in Chongli, not far from the site of the Winter Olympics.
He notes that in recent years there has been a boom in winter sports tourism.
Two years ago, a high-speed railway was built from Beijing to Chongli, and now no one in the local area suffers from unemployment.
More and more shops are opening in the country that sell clothing and equipment for winter sports.
On the slopes, they open restaurants with national cuisine dishes.
There is even a testing station for COVID-19 in Taipei now.
China is trying to create a flourishing winter sports industry, its athletes must become leaders in major international competitions, and resorts and equipment must reach world-class levels.
More than 500 million people worldwide could be plunged into extreme poverty due to the pandemic, the World Health Organization has said.
More than 500 million people in the world could be plunged into extreme poverty as a result of the coronavirus pandemic, the World Health Organization (WHO) and the World Bank (WB) have warned.
On 12 December, the World Health Organization (WHO) and the World Bank published two complementary reports to mark the International Day of Universal Health Coverage.
They noted that the pandemic has led to disruptions in the provision of primary health care, and has overstretched health systems.
As a result, for the first time in 10 years, immunization coverage has fallen, tuberculosis and malaria mortality rates have increased.
The WHO and the World Bank have stressed that the pandemic has caused "the worst economic crisis since the 1930s, so people are finding it harder to pay for treatment."
The situation is pushing more than 500 million people into extreme poverty, because they have to pay for these services out of their own pockets.
In October, UN Secretary-General António Guterres said the coronavirus pandemic has pushed more than 100 million people into poverty, with more than four billion people virtually without social support.
Makita KP0810
Official Makita dealer.
The powerful motor is ideal for edging.
Lightweight and beautifully balanced.
The use of both standard and bilateral mini-grants.
A simple quick-release system.
The new ergonomic design of the case, rubber inserts in the handle to reduce the vibration effect on the user's hands.
Three V-shaped channels for removing different-sized trash.
The dust removal system is a choice: left or right.
Wife, this is beaver meat.
It's a disgrace.
The flying mice with the pincers have already been satiated, and the jellyfish have begun to take an interest.
Oh, how many more oddities the crocodilians, the mammoths, the lemmings might have in store for us.
Reuters: Taiwan minister cut off from 'Democracy Summit' by White House request
Taiwan's Minister of Digital Technology Audrey Tang's panel discussion at the US-organized "Summit for Democracy" was switched to a no-video mode, according to a YouTube recording of the summit.
Reuters, citing sources, said the feed was shut down at the request of the White House.
They said the reason was a map showing Taiwan in a different colour from mainland China, which considers the island to be its territory.
The map Ms Tan showed was compiled by the South African civil society organisation CIVICUS and ranked countries according to their level of civil liberties.
Taiwan was marked green as "open" and China, North Korea, Laos and Vietnam were marked red as "closed."
After the minister showed the map, her side was replaced with a screenshot with a note that "views expressed do not necessarily reflect the views of the U.S. government."
China was not invited to the “Democracy Summit”.
Reuters sources said the map Taiwan's foreign minister showed could run counter to Washington's "One China" policy.
One source told the agency that after the map was displayed, the U.S. National Security Council angrily contacted the State Department, accusing it of showing Taiwan as a separate country.
The Washington-based "Democracy Summit" was held from December 9 to 10 with the participation of representatives of 110 countries and territories, as well as civil society and charitable organizations.
Russia was not invited to the summit.
During the “zero day” of the summit, the winner of the Nobel Peace Prize, the editor-in-chief of Novaya Gazeta, Dmitry Muratov, called for the creation of an international fund, through which money obtained through corruption would be donated to charity.
Earlier today, Russian Deputy Foreign Minister Yuri Averianov stated that the G20 summit was "anti-Russian and anti-Chinese."
They serve you food like they're cooking it, and there's all the rotten meat everywhere. The butcher has all the meat left.
Journalism is the art of making news out of nothing.
They don't eat the meat, they eat the horns and hoofs, and they get a glue-like substance.
The finished product looks like a yellow semi-transparent strip with hardly any odour and is hard like plastic, used as natural gelatin.
In fact, the amount of harmful substances from recycling is no more than from decomposition.
But this saves companies a lot of money.
That is why a fairy tale about ecology was invented for the Lokhvans, who are also working on collecting garbage for free in the name of the idea.
Personally, my contribution to the environment is to refuse to buy things I don't need and to use things for a long time.
If I go over the line, I don't throw it away, I give it to charity.
Jogel Camp Jfs-1120-016 soccer shorts, white/black (XL).
Description: Football shorts are great for playing football and doing sports.
Shorts have a straight, convenient cut.
The wide belt and adjustable cord provide a comfortable fit.
The fabric has high strength, durability, lightness and good air permeability, which meet the requirements of the game at any level.
The updated brand logo is on the left side.
Shorts are packed in a re-sealable, multi-use pouch with a zip-up closure.
Stylish appearance, straight cut, wide belt with drawstring, durable and long-lasting fabric, good breathability.
Specifications.
Pursue a specialty that allows you to work online.
We have many who are squeezed by the fact that they work for their uncle, but abroad.
But because of the difference in currencies, this is advantageous for us.
Compared to other countries, we are still poor.
Of course, you will have to learn different tricks, but... the network allows you to be independent of the local labour market.
But our country is almost not creating jobs.
And what they create is not worth it.
Dining set "Egoist-unity" with gold (4 pieces).
The “Royal Childhood” collection is one of the largest and most famous collections of children’s silver in Russia.
It contains many charming models of silver spoons, forks and knives, ladles and scoops, snuff boxes and snuffers.
All children's silver items are rigorously quality controlled.
The eco-silver produced directly on the factory is carefully hand-polished with cotton balls, making the products absolutely safe for children.
Regular use of silver objects can support the body's own immune system and even prevent some of the common childhood diseases.
The factory specialists received a grant to use a complex but very beautiful gilding technique, which was used by the famous Carl Faberge.
This allowed for the creation of incredibly vivid and voluminous images on the products.
The collection is full of cute characters that will become the child's faithful friends.
Inka Belloc, everything will be all right.
There is another easy one.
The fibrous tissue regenerates well if all of it is removed, but the remaining portion will grow back.
If it is a pneumonectomy, then the second lung will become larger over time and will work for two.
Try to breathe in full, fathers are stronger than daughters, they don't like their tears.
Don't be too early.
Smile and breathe, breathe...
New Shepard spacecraft with six tourists on board made suborbital flight
Blue Origin's New Shepard spacecraft with six tourists on board made a suborbital flight on Saturday, 11 December.
The trip, which was streamed on the company's website, lasted for more than ten minutes, after which the capsule with the passengers landed on Earth, TASS reports.
The launch of the rocket was carried out from the cosmodrome in the vicinity of the American city of Van Horn (Texas).
The ship reached an altitude of just over 100 km, and the space tourists found themselves in a state of weightlessness.
The rocket itself landed on the launch pad as planned.
Blue Origin successfully conducted the first suborbital flight of its New Shepard spacecraft with passengers on board on July 20.
ZARISOVKIS OF DERVENECKIAN MOSCOW CITIZEN.
Don't lump them all together - bad people do exist, and you may have a claim against them for a specific reason...
But what about the number of children, the age, the pension fund and so on?
Write that they are "thieves who didn't return the money."
But how many and when to have children is none of your business, until they get together and hang you from their necks.
But if that's ruled out, what right do you have to condemn them?
Well, it's probably only in education...
The chosen (themselves) parents dictate their own rules, openly flouting the existing ones.
And if this applies to other areas of life, such as justice and so on?
For them, the laws are not written.
And if dad actually implements his parenting and education methods?
It's some kind of example for others to follow. Very bad.
The embroidery set DESIGN WORKS 2719.
Contents: Aida 14ct dark blue canvas, wool, sequins, beads, needles, chart, instructions.
Design Works production began in 1987 and is still popular all over the world.
Many of the motifs were worked out by the well-known designer Ronald West.
The Design Works cross stitch kits are supplied with quality Aida fabric, 100% cotton muline and a 24 count tapestry needle.
You will also find a range of kits for embroidery on plastic canvas, embroidery Tobin - this is embroidery on napkins, carpets and tablecloths and much more.
China strengthens prevention and control of COVID-19 epidemic in cities with land ports
The Joint Prevention and Control Mechanism of the State Council of the People's Republic of China has issued a circular to strengthen the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in cities with land border crossings, in order to further prevent the importation of the virus from abroad.
According to the circular, people leaving the designated cities must provide a negative nucleic acid test result for COVID-19 taken within 48 hours before departure.
Travellers arriving in cities with land border crossings must take a minimum of one COVID-19 nucleic acid test on arrival.
The document states that these requirements will apply from the date that the relevant provincial-level administrative units define and publish the zones of the cities in question until March 15, 2022.
In addition, it is noted that cities where land border posts are located and which meet certain conditions may consider the possibility of establishing buffer zones for the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic within their jurisdiction.
Taisya Sokolova, as usual, draws Russian women to the Eastern ethnicity by Indian films that are only shown in cinemas in Russia.
In the west, nobody looked at this rubbish with the natives.
And how many towns and villages have been forgotten and abandoned?
Sontelle Spring Mattress Vivre Castom family, 140x195, SKU: 5110704.
The RelaxFoam 2-inch mattress layers are: aloe latex 3 inches, coconut 2 inches TFK, coconut 2 inches, aloe latex 3 inches, RelaxFoam 2 inches.
The cover is a three-piece Splendid swimsuit.
The cotton knit fabric has a special design.
The base is made from special synthetic threads that provide special strength and softness of the material.
The cellular structure of the mattress supports natural temperature regulation and moisture management while you sleep and rest.
40% cotton, 60% polyester, density 230 g/m2.
Dimax OK Basis mattress, size 130x185.
The orthopedic mattress OK Basis is one of the most affordable models in the line.
The Balance Foam filling provides the mattress with all the necessary orthopedic properties, but at an affordable price.
This product is an optimal combination of price and quality.
Pen Balance is a modern material that is obtained from EPS.
The filler is hypoallergenic and safe.
That is why the pen is widely used in industry.
Its safety and reliability have been confirmed by a special certificate obtained in Europe, where the requirements are much stricter than in Russia.
Another important quality of the Balance Foam is its orthopedicity: the material supports the correct position of the person throughout the entire sleep time.
Thanks to the mattress, the mattress gained a hardness below the average level, so the product is considered to be soft by the manufacturer.
The main load-bearing block in the mattress is SuperSprings.
It is notable for the content of independent springs, here there are 256 elements per square meter.
The practical block can withstand a weight of up to 100 kg on the sleeping place, distributes the load and adapts the surface to the sleeper, strengthening the orthopedic qualities of the foam.
The manufacturer offers the option of choosing between a 12 cm and 18 cm spring block without changing the final price.
Make sure to specify your preferences when ordering with the store operator.
The mattress is supplied in a tricot cover, along with it the height of the model is 21 cm.
The cover is non-removable.
The orthopedic gel used in the mattress has a CertiPUR certificate.
Arte Lamp A9566AP-1WG from Arte Lamp.
It would be perfect for a room like a living room.
The main part of the lamp is made of metal.
The lighting fixture is available in gold.
The lamp uses E14 bulbs.
The total power allows to illuminate about 2 m2.
The manufacturer recommends this luminaire for rooms decorated in the “Classic” style.
The Foreign Ministry has reported on the “sad conclusion” of relations between Russia and the United States
Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Ryabkov in an interview with Izvestia assessed the prospects of relations between Moscow and Washington.
He noted that the long history of interaction has led to tragic conclusions, and the problems between the two countries did not begin yesterday.
One-sided negative predictability is there, but in terms of some sort of improvement in relations, it is completely unpredictable.
It's a sad conclusion after a long journey we've been on with this administration, with Trump, and with Obama.
The problems started not yesterday," the diplomat said.
According to Ryabkov, the problem is that the United States is trying to impose its approaches on Russia on a number of issues.
The deputy foreign minister added that he would not have been optimistic about the prospects for improving relations and did not expect a change in Washington's position.
He explained that there has been no progress on areas such as strategic stability and cyber security.
Russia, meanwhile, urges the United States to take a responsible approach to issues of international security and hopes that the signals will be heard and that Americans will listen to the arguments of common sense.
Previously, Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov stated at a meeting with U.S. Secretary of State Antony Blinken that Moscow is ready to resume dialogue with the United States.
Virologist warns of COVID-19 vaccine risks outside hospitals
People who have been given the nasal vaccine for COVID-19 may develop an allergy and need medical help, so the first points for administering the vaccine should not be set up in airports and shopping centres.
This was reported by TASS to a virologist, corresponding member of the Russian Academy of Sciences, head of the bionanotechnology, microbiology and virology laboratory of the Novosibirsk State University, Sergey Netesov.
It is easier to set up vaccination points for the nasopharyngeal vaccine in airports and shopping centres, but I would only do this in the first instance in medical facilities.
The point is that there is a possibility of an allergic reaction to such a vaccine, it is small, but it is desirable that the person sits next to the doctor's office afterwards.
Doctors have special sets of anti-allergy drugs that work literally within minutes or two, which is sometimes very useful," Netetsov said.
According to the virologist, it will be possible to think about vaccination in shopping centres when there is experience in using the drug.
He also stressed that when using a nasal vaccine it was important that it reached the mucous membrane of the nose.
However, there is a possibility that the vaccine will not reach its destination if the person who has been vaccinated sneezes after the injection.
The picture on the canvas, the anime "Blade of the Demon Slayer" 5426 40x60.
Do you want to feel like a real artist?
The numbers are interesting for both children and adults.
After all, many love to draw, but sometimes lack the skills or abilities.
This is a simple but very interesting activity that allows you to relax, realize your creative potential and create masterpieces with your own hands.
There is a wide range of unusual pictures and "off-the-beaten-track" plots!
We develop topical stories ourselves and try to make sure that the result surprises you!
It's all very simple!
When the outlines are painted onto the canvas, they do not "float," they do not dissolve in water.
Each segment is numbered to avoid getting lost in the colours.
The picture in its finished form will be a bright element of the setting, an accent of the interior, attracting attention at first glance.
But this picture was not painted by some artist.
You drew her yourself.
With your own hands!
Serbia produced 2 million doses of Sputnik V vaccine
The Sputnik V vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
Serbia produced about 2 million doses of the Russian vaccine Sputnik V, the country’s Minister of Innovation and Technological Development Nenad Popovic told TASS.
"The Torlak State Institute has produced around 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine so far, and we expect to produce at least 4 million in the coming period," Popovic stated.
According to him, the Russian vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
In this regard, the republic plans to purchase an additional million doses of the vaccine from Russia.
The Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of Serbia also expressed interest in the production of the vaccine "Sputnik V" and the drug "Sputnik Light" in the country.
Russian Prime Minister Mikhail Mishustin has reported that Russia has delivered almost two million doses of the Russian-made coronavirus vaccine “Sputnik V” to Serbia.
Lama, they say, is the true church.
We cannot know whether these true believers exist or not.
Each of us would like to be a true believer, and each of us is trying to be one.
But no one should say anything about themselves or about those who believe as they do that they are the only true believers.
Because if they can say to themselves that they are true believers, then so can everyone else.
Benartti Prime Orto S1000 145x190.
The Prime Orto S1000 mattress has different firmness sides, the total height of the mattress is 22 cm.
The maximum load per sleeping place is 150 kg.
The mattress is based on the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is contained in its own tissue pocket, which allows the springs to distribute the body's weight correctly.
An insulating layer of felt has been added to the spring block for added protection.
On one side of the mattress, there is a 3 cm layer of coconut coir, which provides additional firmness and durability to the mattress.
On the opposite side of the mattress, a layer of coconut fibre 3 cm and natural latex 1 cm is added.
Natural latex has an anatomical effect and wear-resistant properties.
The mattress cover is made from cotton Jacquard fabric, which is printed on an environmentally friendly material called Hollcon.
The fabric was treated with a special antibacterial Sanitized (Switzerland) treatment.
The impregnation provides complete destruction of mould spores, prevents the development of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress comes with four easy-to-use handles for turning, and air vents for additional ventilation of the mattress layers.
The mattress perimeter is additionally reinforced with an artificial leather frame, which significantly increases its service life.
Alexander M., Please remind me, what style did the marathon at the 2021 World Championships run?
You see the ski slope, on which the participants of the race should finish in the classic style?
Attention, the question is what Klebo is doing right of Bolshunov and how he wants to get to the slope if he was going down the slope behind him before the turn?
And the "best finisher" in the 1.5 km and after 50 km are two different things.
It has been a long time...
I was, in fact, not even a driver.
He had the rights, but he couldn't ride.
They offered to drive 250 km in one direction on the MAZ!
Young, bad, agreed.
The host is nearby, he's drinking water, I'm eating.
First, as king, he took the center!
A column formed behind me.
Missed.
Then the belt broke on the Gure.
Then we were stopped by the guards.
The convoy was organized and their car broke down.
You have to push.
The owner of the MAZ explained that he was drunk, and the driver was inexperienced.
And what kind of drunk is he?
Don't trip, don't fall.
Ahead of us are the megaphones and ahead!
I don't think it's coming out of the ads, he's hurting.
The singers are saying the same thing: about returning to the pension age.
Long ago, all budgets have been established taking into account the billions of uncollected pension contributions.
Who is telling them this nonsense?
In Britain, 1,239 cases of the omicron strain of the coronavirus were recorded in one day - RT in Russian
In the UK, 1,239 cases of infection with the new omicron strain of the coronavirus have been identified in the past 24 hours.
Sky News reports this.
In particular, 1,196 new cases of the Omicron strain were recorded in England, 38 people were infected with the new variant in Scotland and five in Northern Ireland.
The total number of people infected with the new strain of Covid-19 in the UK has reached 3,137.
Previously, the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine's (LSHTM) pessimistic forecast predicted that by April, up to 75,000 people in the UK could die from the coronavirus caused by the "Omicron" strain.
Peskov warned of the suffering of western countries that impose anti-Russian sanctions
Russian President’s press secretary Dmitry Peskov commented on the possible introduction of anti-Russian sanctions in the event of continued “aggressive actions” against Ukraine, including due to the alleged “invasion” of the country’s territory.
"It is impossible to impose restrictions on Russia and not feel the pain yourself," the Kremlin's official spokesman said on the Russia 1 television channel.
Peskov says this is "understood by everyone in the world."
Earlier it was reported that the United States is considering the possibility of introducing anti-Russian sanctions in the energy sector as a last resort.
In addition, Washington and the European Union are planning to introduce restrictions that will make it more difficult to convert rubles into dollars for Russian banks and the Russian Direct Investment Fund.
At the same time, the head of Sberbank, German Gref, is sure that this is impossible.
From intelligent people - respectively, intelligent comments!
Something about these simple-to-the-point-of-nausea recipes is making me nauseous.
Apparently, the ideas have run out.
Even in the distant past, my mother baked delicious pies and cakes, and it never occurred to her to compare a piece of bread smeared with jam with a cake.
Ksenia, you don’t need to bring anything to my mind, my mind will figure it out on its own!
"The inability of the mind separated from the Spirit to perceive" - what are you talking about?
Imagine explaining this to a child who doesn't know what a finger is!
(Keep in mind that a child up to 3-5 years old still has open channels of communication with the thin world, and the child may know more than you!)
New Caledonia rejects independence from France
According to the final results of the third independence referendum in New Caledonia, a majority of participants have decided to remain part of France.
This was reported by the French TV channel BFM.TV on December 12.
96.5% of those who voted opposed independence.
3.51% of the archipelago's population voted for independence from France.
They annulled the results of 2.99% of the ballots.
Turnout on the day was very low: about 55% of the archipelago's population turned out to vote.
According to experts, the low turnout is explained by calls by separatists to boycott the referendum due to the coronavirus.
Paris has refused to move the referendum date.
In October 2020, the residents of New Caledonia voted against independence from France in a referendum.
A referendum on independence was already held in the region in 2018.
Most of the residents supported the archipelago's inclusion in France.
New Caledonia is almost 20,000 kilometres from mainland France.
In 1853, France declared New Caledonia its possession.
About 270,000 people live on the archipelago, and the territory has a special administrative-territorial status.
A 1998 agreement between Paris and the New Caledonia administration allows the territory to hold two referendums on its independence, two years apart.
Boris, if you don't know the history, don't write.
The name of the city of Arsk comes from the Bulgar-Tatarian word “Artysh” (Viburnum).
The Udmurts (or Tatars) live in the northern regions of Balta-Sinyaksky, Kukmorsky districts.
The Udmurts are beautiful, hardworking people, they have preserved their language, they live in friendship with the Tatars, they know 3-4 languages.
Victor, I don't know your age, but I want to tell you that the Motherland will never abandon you.
They throw dummies, shouting "good slogans".
I say this to you with complete confidence, based on my own experience.
Don't piss in the well, you might have to drink it!
WHO preliminary considers Omicron less dangerous than Delta
The World Health Organization (WHO) has preliminarily determined that "omicron" is less dangerous than the Delta strain of the coronavirus.
However, there are data on the reduced effectiveness of vaccines against the new variant of COVID-19.
According to information as of December 9, Omicron has been registered in 63 countries.
"Preliminary data and a significantly altered antigenic profile of the omicron strain suggest a reduced efficacy of the vaccine against infection and transmission of the variant.
Preliminary findings from South Africa suggest that it (the "severity of the disease" - rare) may be less severe than with "delta," the WHO said in a technical bulletin.
The organization notes that so far, all registered cases of "omicron" infection in the EU have been mild or asymptomatic.
However, the new strain appears to be spreading faster than the Delta variant.
There have been two cases of infection with the omicron strain in Russia.
They were "previously immunized," the Gamaa al-Islamiya Center reported.
Anna Popova, head of Rostecnadzor, stated that there are no reliable data on whether the new coronavirus variant is less dangerous than the others.
In fact, the lack of sun for us, Southerners, is very critical.
In ten days spent in Petersburg, somewhere in November, we saw the sun for the first time when our returning plane took off over the clouds.
That's when I realized what I'd been missing all this time in beautiful Petersburg.
Unforgettable jeep tours in the Caucasus:
To learn what one did not know before - eyes, mouth and skin - is a great opportunity!
Those who see only water in the ocean
The one on the ground doesn't notice the mountains.
Your adventure world +7 905 989 9172 What'sApp
Siberian Expeditions - we can spoil even the worst mood!
Svetlana, not Svetlana, is not such a thing - they can't be.
If your beloved, with whom you are going to spend the rest of your life, does not meet your requests, then he is a parasite who does not want to give back as much as he takes.
The problem with women is that they are slowly but surely putting all the pressure on themselves.
And who is to blame if you grab the gun yourself?
Four scenarios have been named for Zelensky in Ukraine
Former Verkhovna Rada deputy Vadim Denisenko has listed four scenarios for the development of events for the President of Ukraine Vladimir Zelensky in 2022.
In his opinion, the head of state may be left without the support of the West, and he may also compromise on Donbas.
On Sunday, December 12, Denisenko wrote about this in a post on the "Glavred" website.
The first option, which Denisenko called an "ideal storm," assumes that the key Western countries will stop supporting Ukraine, reaching an agreement on the country's future without its participation.
Such a development will contribute to a deep crisis that Ukraine may face in 2023.
"At the same time, there is a reduction in the prices of key products that we traditionally export ... internal protests and opposition to the key FPGs (financial-industrial groups. - Editor's note) ", - added the former parliamentarian.
According to Denisenko, there is another scenario for the situation to develop - "a war against everyone."
This forecast will come true in the event of high political turbulence, when the Ukrainian authorities will face a number of problems.
In such a situation, the Ukrainian leadership may be forced to make concessions on Donbas, which could lead to a confrontation within the country.
By the end of the summer, Zelensky’s position will weaken, the likelihood of such a situation is up to 50-55%, according to the former deputy.
The third scenario for the development of the situation in Ukrainian politics is the confrontation of the groups of people who do not agree with Zelensky, which will likely result in the seizure of control over the power bloc and the implementation of "populist initiatives."
In this scenario, Zelensky will begin the “restructuring of power,” added Denisenko.
Another scenario is to turn Zelensky into a “father of the nation”.
This can be brought about by some event that becomes a major shock to society.
"The event should be large enough to cause a reaction from our partners and to increase support for Ukraine," Denisenko said.
Such a development of the situation is possible as a result of a natural disaster, a technogenic disaster or aggressive actions of Russia, believes the former deputy.
At the same time, the Russian side has already denied any possibility of an “invasion” of Ukraine.
In Moscow, it was noted that it was the Ukrainian authorities, NATO and the United States that were increasing military activity near the Russian borders.
Earlier, on November 11, the data of the sociological group “Rating” showed that the rating of the Ukrainian president fell to record low levels, reaching 19.3%.
It is the lowest figure since he was elected head of state.
Analysts predicted that in the event of early presidential elections in Ukraine, 21.8% of voters would vote for Zelensky, while 14.5% would vote for the former president of the country, Petro Poroshenko.
At the same time, only 19.3% of respondents expressed their support for the president.
KAISER Sena dental unit (74182)
The KAISER Sena (74182) is one of the best choices in this category.
This brand is popular for its quality and durability, as many customer reviews on third-party websites attest.
When you buy this product from us, you also get our guarantee of quality and functionality.
We deliver by transport companies throughout Russia and to any region.
In the event of any defects being found, we will refund you the full cost of your purchase without question.
When calling the operator, you will be able to get a personal discount on the product.
Please leave a review after purchase.
The author thanks for the story about the great athlete, did not know that Elena Shushunova died, very sad to learn this.
I remember how I cheered her on at the Olympics in Seoul, for us, residents of Primorsky Krai, it was a live broadcast, real time.
Such a passion, the emotions were overwhelming, I remember the joy when Elena won.
And I was also happy for the other victories, like the ones for Salnikov, for the football players, for all the Soviet athletes then.
I once saw a documentary about one of the Central American countries, and there were coconuts falling onto the deck of the ship like barrels.
The pumpkins were enormous.
I myself have worked many times in my youth in the harvesting and loading of cucumbers in the Astrakhan region and have never seen cucumbers weighing more than a pound.
I buy cucumbers weighing 4-5 kg straight from the vine and not earlier than the beginning of August.
A bustier-balconette with soft lace cups (size 90E, colour beige, composition: 90% polyamide, 10% elastane, reference: 12008).
A bustle-belt with soft, embroidered cups, on a frame.
The bottom of the cup is reinforced with non-elastic transparent plastic.
The side inner part of the cup, in the area of the bra strap, is reinforced with non-elastic fabric in the fold, without additional seams for comfort.
This element allows the fabric to not stretch.
The richness of the embroidery can be appreciated through the décolleté and under the breasts.
Vertical ribs in the side panels of the single-layer microfiber fabric do not allow the fabric to shrink at large sizes.
The article was very bad, mean, poisonous.
They went through people you don't know.
But now it is liked by many, people are interested in atoms.
I hope the commentators are fair and honest and know what they are talking about.
In Moscow, at night, 100 times you will think about going to the store alone. Migrants are everywhere, their crowds.
They consider themselves the owners.
And about the child benefits and pensions, are you serious?
Co-pays are paid up to 3 years, pensions are 12,000, someone wrote about dentistry, prosthetics in our country is already paid and very expensive.
People are like people from another planet.
In France, it is bad, and in ours, it is good?
The Beautyson Sense Hard S600 mini Sint mattress has a compact shape, comfortable elasticity and firmness, wear-resistant and durable properties.
The “Beautyson” brand from the “Sense” series is designed for the rehabilitation of people suffering from diseases of the musculoskeletal and circulatory systems.
The design provides uniform load distribution over the surface and a pronounced comfort effect.
The Beauty Johnson Sensation Hard S600 Mini is a stand-alone, low-profile S600 mini with reduced spring height.
Beautyson uses sponbond, coconut coir and polyurethane as fillers.
The spacer serves as an intermediate insulating layer between the soft materials and the springs.
The orthopedic pen with carbon-based coating is applied to the surface of the figurine, which provides a micro-massage effect.
Coconut coir is a hypoallergenic material that gives the mattress high moisture-wicking and breathability properties.
The mattress cover is made from a thick jacquard fabric with synthetic fibres.
The material is durable and long-lasting, does not fade and does not require special care.
The poet arrested for the action on Red Square: "For Evtushenko's quote, they give 10 days, here it is, the power of poetry!"
On the first day of the week, 21-year-old poet Alexander Volchenkov was arrested for ten days.
A student of the Higher School of Economics was detained in Red Square with a placard with the hashtag #poetforrussia more than a poet.
This quote is attributed to the writer Evgeny Evtushenko.
Alexander was issued an administrative summons for a violation of the Securities Exchange Act for a second time.
He was first detained on January 23 on Pushkin Square, at a rally in support of Alexei Navalny.
"The goal was to draw attention to poetry in general, and now, unfortunately, interest in it, unfortunately, has disappeared, to the detriment of the general culture in Russia, as well as a small hope to inspire unknown poets to write their poems on the Internet under this hashtag," Alexander explains.
We have spoken to the young poet to find out the circumstances of his arrest and to get more details on the message he was trying to send.
How did the police treat you when you were stopped this time and previously?
What did the department say about your stunt?
This time the officers were more professional, the arrest as minimal as possible, courteous, as funny as it may sound in the context of this word.
The OMONs were taken at Pushkinskaya and taken hard.
They asked the standard questions about motive.
When they heard it, in principle, they looked if not approvingly, then understandingly.
Except for the monkey bars, which were all four sides, I knew what I was getting into.
And if after the action under this hashtag people start writing their poems, even a few of them, I will not waste these 10 days for nothing.
According to the protocol, you should talk to each other in the language of the Tumba-Yumba tribe, at least.
At public and official events, they speak to the audience in their own language, so that everyone understands what happened in the Bundestag on 25 September 2001, either in their own language or with the help of a translator.
This is a protocol and nothing more, by the way, Angela Merkel speaks Russian fluently and yet resorts to the services of a translator.
And at official events, the stenographer still writes by hand, and the stenographer does not have to know several languages.
I don't want to say a lot of words, just say no!
But that's a lot of water.
Well, to go as a tourist for six months "to the Andes, then to Nepal."
Before turning all assets into liquid shares.
And gradually sell these shares, opening a bank account in any country in the world.
To sell not in dollars, but in a less dependent on the US currency, such as Swiss francs.
And then, after that, to file for divorce from America.
However, that is not all that keeps Americans in the US.
They believe that the US is better than anywhere else.
They grow them like that.
Hansgrohe Quattro shower head with 3 outlets (15930180).
Collection: Quattro; Type: Concealed-fit mechanism; Purpose: Mixer, bath, washbasin; Built-in systems: Yes; Installation type: Built-in (in the wall); Body material: Brass; Concealed-fit mechanism: Included; Number of mounting holes: 1; Country of origin of the brand: Germany; Manufacturer's article number: 15930180; Barcode: 4011097345239.
Additional information: requires a pressure regulator; set includes a ceramic cartridge, a sealing flange; 3 consumers; it is possible to connect 2 consumers (nozzles) simultaneously; suitable for all Quattro external parts; water consumption: 65 l/min.
Researchers explain how potatoes help fight age-related diseases
The study found that potatoes are rich in vitamins and minerals that help improve circulation and lower cholesterol levels.
The root contains vitamins of the B group, vitamin C, phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, riboflavin, folic and pantothenic acids.
All these elements help to function the body's systems.
In addition, potatoes help in the fight against age-related disorders.
Its high fibre content makes it beneficial for the digestive system, and regular consumption may also help prevent hypertension and atherosclerosis.
However, for the greatest benefit, the root vegetable should be boiled or stewed, not fried in oil.
Previously, The Daily Express warned that potatoes could be dangerous for diabetics, as well as other high glycemic index foods.
These are products with a high carbohydrate content that are quickly broken down into sugar, such as sugar-sweetened beverages, white rice, and white bread.
In early December, Kommersant warned of a possible shortage of Russian potatoes, noting a decrease in their production in private farms and an increase in processing capacity.
According to market participants, the current shortage of products can only be replaced by imports.
Lostfilm, lordfilm and other pirates have been removed from Yandex's collection
Candidates for expulsion
In 2015, the copyright holders from the RAEC/Media cluster compiled a list of the 100 largest pirate websites in the Runet, and most of them ceased to exist, says the head of the Internet Research Institute Karen Kazaryan.
But some - Kinogo, Lostfilm, Filmix - have managed to survive, he adds, citing regular domain name changes.
For example, on Lostfilm, which is available in search results as both Yandex and Google, one can watch the pirate copies of the Netflix series "Squid Game" and "Tender" by director Anna Melikyan - the original series of Russia's largest video service ivi (owned by AIV).
On Kinogo, which is also available on search engines, you can watch the animated news "Encanto," but judging by the quality of the video, it is a so-called screen (filmed in a movie theater pirate copy of the film).
Filmix, which can also be found through search engines, has the series “Univer. 10 Years Later” from the TNT channel (part of Gazprom Media).
Svetlana M., of course, but I don't care if the son is offended or not.
If we have any issues, it's better not to meet up, it's on the way.
Of course, it's good that such things happen rarely.
The bra with soft cups without a frame and a front closure is coffee 135I GI1265.
The T-shaped back is reinforced on the inside with criss-cross elastic cotton and Lycra.
The bustgaller is made of microfibre combined with a mesh for air permeability.
Cotton-stuffed cups for a comfortable fit.
The unique Magiclift design (interlocking under the breasts and along the décolletage) lifts, separates and supports the breasts.
The wide, comfortable straps are adjustable from the back.
Ludmila, China now has the most advanced space technology.
Russia has already fallen hopelessly behind.
"This idea developed by the Poles" - it would be more accurate to say that Poland only adapted the idea of 1776, but developed it quite effectively.
In fact, the slogan “The suburbs are not Russia” appeared in 1848.
In general, it doesn't really change anything.
I watched her interview, the girl said that her biggest dream was to grow wings, and her dad kept cutting them off.
Well, it's all very dubious, anyway.
Well, she got into a university, and what next?
The wall lamp Maytoni MOD081WL-L13G3K Tessara.
The wide circle of light, framed by "molecules" of light, provides the most even and bright illumination of the space.
The “atomic” or “molecular” design, reflecting the nature and natural essence of each object, is not losing its relevance and allows you to effectively place accents in the interior.
One of the distinctive features of such lamps is their weightlessness.
By using thin, almost invisible cables that are regulated by height, the impression is created that the chandelier is floating in the air.
The metallic gold fittings and matte-white mini-pendants complement any palette with ease, while the collection's pendant and sconces will make a ready-made ensemble for lighting a living room, a bedroom and a hallway.
Well, in terms of taste and colour, that is.
I really liked Tarragon, not the current one, of course.
The juices were very tasty and were served in tall glass cylinders.
Three scoops of ice cream is overkill, in my opinion.
Two were fine.
Dimax Micro Ultimate mattress, 160x190
Orthopedic spring mattress Micro Ultimate.
The model is convenient because it has two different softnesses – high and slightly above average.
The product includes only high-quality and premium fillers, which have proven themselves exclusively in the best way.
Springs: a block of independent springs “micro-package” is installed in the center of the model.
This means that the bed has 2000 springs that work completely autonomously.
This is what gives them their unique point-by-point adjustment.
The "Micropack" is the highest frequency of all the Dimaksa spring blocks, so it has a very pronounced orthopaedic effect and is considered to be a premium product.
Fillers: The top and bottom are lined with a combination of coir and natural latex.
The only difference is the layout of the tiles.
If one surface is latex, the other is coconut coir.
Such a tandem of fillers has already been established as a classic, since it transfers not only orthopedic, but also anatomical properties to the mattress.
If the latex provides the right support for the back, then the latex adapts the surface to the human body.
Cover: The model is supplied in a shrink-wrapped, three-ply Aloe Vera sheet.
If the client wishes, it can be made both portable and fixed.
The total height of the product is 27 cm, the recommended load on the bed is 170 kg.
Warranty and safety: the warranty period is 3 years.
The mattress has all the necessary certificates and documents confirming its full safety and reliability in operation.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress has a CertiPUR certificate.
Estonian scientists will search for life on Venus
Massachusetts Institute of Technology in collaboration with Tartu Observatory and other research institutions and companies is preparing three missions to Venus to search for signs of life in the atmosphere, Aktuaalne kaamera reported on Sunday.
The goal of the five-year mission is to assess the habitability of Venus' clouds, and then search for life there.
For the project, Tartu scientists have developed instruments for measuring the acidity and oxygen content of Venus' clouds.
Up until now, it has been assumed that Venus, the planet closest to Earth, is too acidic to support life, but it is likely that Venus was once a more Earth-like planet.
A sample from Venus should arrive on the third mission.
If we find life there, then the big question will be whether it is like life on Earth or different.
If it is very similar, then it will be obvious that life on Earth did not start on Earth.
If it is different, then it may be more likely that life began on Earth," said the leader of the Estonian team of the Venus Life Finder project, Mikk Pajusel.
A hat, not a phone...
It's been a year and a half, and the price...
This Chinese nonsense has already gotten old...
They can't make a quality phone...
At least, my Samsung has already survived three of these (my friends have already thrown them away) and it will survive more!
Metaverses will change the Russian business
The metaverse theme has become popular this autumn, when Mark Zuckerberg announced that Facebook would become Meta.
For the market, this event was a significant signal: the largest player confirmed the development of a new format of digital interaction between people.
As a result, business in Russia, as well as all over the world, will invest in the creation of their own metaverses and their subsequent monetization.
Metaverses should be viewed as a continuation of the objectively existing trends.
On the one hand, the trend towards creating distance interactions in the context of a pandemic, because people are tired of fragmentation and restrictions.
On the other hand, this is a consequence of the business world's desire to develop ecosystems and adapt their operations to them.
The third is that they are the logical extension of the trend of digitization of assets, where any rights, securities, works of art, and even money are digitized.
Anna, you are right, changing your diet is a conscious process.
When you start eating right, you don't want to eat anything too fatty or unhealthy.
Of course, we'll have the traditional Christmas ham and turkey, but no one is forcing me to eat it all at once.
You can eat it by the spoonful, try it and you'll have enough.
After all, there are ten days of vacation ahead of you, and you can prepare any tasty and healthy dishes.
And how much hell, time, and resources it took her to train.
And after completing the 5th quarter, she was left without a gold medal.
And she also understands that 4 years before the next Olympics she will not be able to do it, i.e. she will never be an Olympic champion.
And the one who hasn't been working out or can't imagine all the hell she's been through, DON'T LAUGH AT HER.
British economist unable to predict 2022
British economist Jim O'Neill was unable to make a forecast for 2022, as he believed such attempts would fail.
He wrote about it in an article for Project Syndicate.
The expert believes that the next year will be full of unpredictability and any trend can change the course.
The most important factor remains the coronavirus pandemic, he believes.
O'Neill also admitted he did not know if the price hike was temporary or not.
As the specialist noted, even before the pandemic it was clear that "the world of central bank unlimited generosity has outlived itself" and it was time to return to the relationship where interest rates adjusted for inflation would be in line with expected growth in GDP.
O'Neill noted that in the context of the pandemic, continued accommodative monetary policy could, according to some experts, lead to a new surge in inflation.
In addition, O'Neill noted the issue of productivity growth, as well as the rise in poverty and climate change.
Earlier, the head of the Global Research Department of Open Investment, Mikhail Shulgin, reported that positive expectations for the dollar in 2022 remain, but the growth potential will be less significant.
Among the risks for the dollar, Shulgin named the monetary and fiscal policy of the Fed, the dynamics of oil prices and the fears in the wake of the coronavirus pandemic.
She had to agree.
But the good news is that if you compare yourself to five years ago, you were less of a container.
Now it is better.
Progress is there, only slow.
There is another problem: there are many environmental initiatives in cities, but people don’t know about them.
Any ecotaxis that collect waste from the house.
In short, the reception point for second-hand goods is used by the marginals.
Very few people bring glass and metal there.
And the author...
Sausages with cats on Soviet factories?
"Low" chocolate in the USSR?
Well, they're not as good as Dosirak, I understand...
But I would now turn to the Soviet confectionery with white filling.
There are none left.
They don't release "Pilot," but "Rosa" is not the same...
EVA (square) car mats for Hyundai Tucson I (2004-2010).
The car mats EVA are made of high-quality material produced in Russia.
The surface of the mats is made up of cells in the shape of rhombuses.
The thickness of the mats is 10 mm, the cell depth is 5-6 mm.
The mats do not absorb or let moisture through.
Dirt is evenly distributed throughout the cells, keeping the surface clean.
The material used to make the mats is elastic, wear-resistant and odourless.
Keeps its properties in the temperature range from -50 to 50 °C.
The mats are easy to maintain and are suitable for year-round use.
The EVA auto-cover maximises the standard carpet coverage, covering the left footrest area.
The back row tunnel is closed.
The edging is made from super-strong car rope.
Dimax Practice Basis Plus V13 180x220 cm
The Dimax (Dimax) Practice Plus 13 mattress has only one type of filling.
This is a 13-cm-high artificial leather plate.
The mattress's material properties give it a symmetrical average stiffness across its sides.
The product is covered with jacquard fabric with a fastener on the comfort layer, removable or non-removable type.
PPU is a hygienic material with anatomical properties.
The main advantages of artificial leather (PU) are characteristics similar to the natural analogue, but at a lower cost.
Artificial latex is elastic and elastic, but unlike natural material, it has a greater stiffness.
It forms the anatomical surface of the mattress with quality support, which provides a comfortable sleep.
The material is well ventilated, does not accumulate moisture and does not cause allergic reactions.
The strength of this filler ensures the durability and wear resistance of the mattress.
A quality mattress that is not afraid of temperature changes.
Anatomical, inexpensive and temperature-resistant, this mattress is ideal for a guest room or a country house.
Its universal medium firmness and maximum load of 100 kg make this mattress suitable for most users.
Russians have given car dealers about 4.5% of the country's GDP
According to the statistics of the Russian Automotive Market Research (RAMP) agency, Russians spent 2.784 trillion rubles on the purchase of new cars in the first 10 months of 2021, which is 28% more than in the same period of the previous year.
To understand the scale - about the same amount (about 3 trillion rubles) was spent by the state to support citizens and the economy during the coronavirus pandemic.
In September last year, President Vladimir Putin said that such a figure was comparable to more than 4.5% of the country's gross domestic product (GDP) in 2020.
In terms of revenues in the Russian market, the Korean brand Kia leads.
In the first ten months of this year, he managed to sell cars worth 32.57 billion rubles, which is almost 24% more than a year ago.
The sister brand of the Kia brand, Hyundai, has also seen a significant increase - more than 35%, and the revenue from the sale of cars is estimated at RUB 27.93 billion.
In the leading positions, this brand and for the increase in the average price of the car - within a year, Hyundai increased by almost 21%, to 1.94 million rubles - the dynamics of price growth was only higher than Changan, Chery, Geely and Mercedes-Benz.
At the same time, the sales volumes of Korean brands grew not so much: according to the statistics of the Automobile Manufacturers Committee of the Association of European Business in Russia, Kia sold 9.4% more cars over the same period last year.
Hyundai - almost 12%.
The Japanese Toyota carmaker has closed the top three in terms of volume of sales in monetary terms - Russians spent 27.55 billion rubles on cars of this brand in the first 10 months of the year, which is 14% more than a year ago.
Japanese cars follow Mercedes-Benz with a figure of 26.61 billion rubles (+75%) - the German premium brand has grown both in volume of sales (by 37%) and the average price of the car (by almost 28%, to 8.2 million rubles).
"Mercedes-Benz is simultaneously experiencing a good increase in sales and a weighted average price - higher, for example, than that of BMW - which is why there is a greater increase in financial capacity, explained the general director of NAPA, Tatiana Arabagdi. -
In terms of sales growth, fantastic figures are being demonstrated by Chinese brands, which have also significantly increased their financial capacity this year."
The Russian Lada demonstrates average dynamics of income growth (plus 28%), Russians spent 22.94 billion rubles on cars of this brand in 10 months.
At the level of last year, the companies are those whose car sales in units in 2021 fell: in particular, Volkswagen, Mitsubishi and Nissan.
UAZ is in the red - Russians spent 12 billion rubles on UAZ SUVs and pickups in the first 10 months of the year, down from 12.4 billion rubles a year earlier.
Against the backdrop of problems with the supply of auto components and production disruptions affecting the entire global automotive industry, car companies continue to continuously adjust prices - the same "AvtoVAZ" raised the prices of Lada models seven times in a year, the last price increase (by 8-10 thousand rubles) took place at the end of November.
Regularly re-write their price lists for their own products and those of other car manufacturers.
The volume of the Russian car market in monetary terms will continue to grow - in addition to the shortage of cars, inflation is also contributing to this, as well as the desire of automakers to make up for past losses, experts say.
In the context of a shortage of cars, I think that many carmakers have even managed to pass on some of the costs of previous periods that they could not include in the price of cars earlier,
Vladimir Bespalov, an analyst at VTB Capital, says: -
I think the financial side of the car industry is feeling pretty good at the moment, maintaining high margins on sales."
An indirect indicator of this is the growth rate of car prices, which is observed in 2021, the expert explains.
In the long run, the market will grow both in terms of quantity and in terms of money, but mainly due to inflation and the complexity of the machines themselves, predicts Bespalov.
As supply increases, the opportunities to raise prices will be limited.
In monetary terms, the Russian car market will continue to grow next year, even if the growth in the cost of cars slows down, notes independent automotive consultant Sergey Burgazliev.
Considering the increased demand and insufficient supply, automakers are now trying to get the highest profit from each sold car, notes Burgazliev. -
It is not expected that the increase in the volume of production of machines will take place at least for the next six months, and in Russia the market is being heated up by the uncertainty of citizens about the future.
Against the backdrop of the situation on the market, cars turned out to be a good investment object - a car bought a year ago, even with mileage, can now be sold for more than the initial cost, notes the expert.
Biden has spoken about the transfer of U.S. troops to Ukraine in the event of a Russian invasion
The US leadership has never considered sending American troops to Ukraine in the event of a "Russian invasion."
The US President, Joe Biden, made this statement.
"There has never been such a plan," the White House chief said in response to a question from a journalist about whether the United States had abandoned the idea.
Biden noted that if the situation around Ukraine escalates, Russia will face economic consequences.
He stressed, however, that the United States and NATO have no obligation to use military force to defend Ukraine in the event of escalation.
The American leader also stated that the possibility of using American troops unilaterally to defend Ukraine is not on the agenda.
Biden explained that if Russia invaded Ukraine, the United States would move forces to NATO countries in Eastern Europe (Bulgaria, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Romania, Slovakia, Czech Republic and Estonia).
"We're going to have to send more American and NATO troops to the eastern flank, B9 - all the NATO countries that we have a sacred obligation to defend them from any Russian attack," Biden said.
Earlier, the Russian President’s press secretary, Dmitry Peskov, noted that Moscow does not have any intentions to invade Ukraine.
Moscow, on the other hand, sees the problem in the use of Turkish drones by Kiev, as well as in the fact that "American weapons are approaching our territory."
I get out of such interviews as soon as possible.
If they already want to make me listen to screams, wait for hours, drink an incomprehensible noise and wash a cup - I shudder to think what it will be like at work.
I'll find a normal place to work, without the echo chamber where you immediately talk to the boss.
Mattress Promtex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 100x185 cm
The average height of the Protex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 mattress is 16 cm. It is made of alternating layers of natural latex and coconut coir.
One side is medium-hard, the other is moderately hard.
A pretty white leather cover is stitched onto the synthetic and is finished with a lightning bolt around the edge.
Two types of filler.
The sandwich model consists of eight layers of fillings.
Between the teak slats, thin coconut wood slats have been laid.
The layered structure of the mattress has increased wear resistance, durability and resistance to loads.
Natural latex is a dense, elastic, breathable material with excellent insulation properties.
The filler holds its shape and quickly recovers after impacts.
Coconut coir strengthens the product, has natural antimicrobial properties.
The combination of these two materials allows for the creation of an orthopedic sleep surface that will last buyers for many years.
Universality and orthopedic support.
Mattresses are suitable for people of different types of body shape and age.
The medium-hard surface is a balanced combination of orthopedics and comfort.
The reverse side is less comfortable for soft tissues, but has more pronounced orthopedic properties.
A moderately firm sleeping surface is more relevant for those who need to "decompress" their backs and maintain a healthy posture.
The mattress is ideal for one person or a couple.
The latter are especially likely to appreciate the presence of a stable surface and the absence of the "wave" effect, when the oscillations on one side of the mattress can be transmitted to the opposite, disturbing a person in their sleep.
Molbert tabletop "Studio" 20*24*54(65) cm for canvas 40 cm.
The desktop monitor "Studio" with a height-adjustable upper holder.
It will fit small-sized holsters.
The material is natural beech, lacquered.
It will be convenient for both beginners and professional artists.
Smooth tilt adjustment.
It is equipped with a shelf for shirts and tablets.
The top holder firmly fixes the canvas.
The maximum height of a molibert is 65 cm, and the maximum size of the canvas is 40 cm.
If a scammer calls from such a number, like "an officer of the Ministry of Internal Affairs" or another law enforcement agency, then it's pointless to hang up, and it's unlikely you'll be able to add the number to the blacklist.
Because to confirm his lie about being connected to the security forces, he quickly repeats the challenge and continues to harass and persuade.
We need more useful advice for the people.
That's what's wrong with the world.
I don't believe that was the case at all.
They don't know what to come up with, who to accuse.
They made it to the Queen.
And the most important thing, they say, is that everyone is to blame, except for the most-most...
It would have been easier to leave people alone from coercion, of course, if we cared about our people.
Maybe all the strains of the virus will disappear...
As in Japan... before the election, the influence and infection rate decreased...
The "Assort No. 2" wool set is 100% Merino wool, 4x10 g.
Wool spinning as a craft began about 8,000 years ago, but it was very difficult to find animal wool to spin, and even more difficult to dye it.
But now, wow!
We present a delicate natural wool for felting from a Russian manufacturer, which does not require you to run through the forest or pasture.
The unique properties of wool for felting allow you to create bright and unique items.
For example, you can make a cute toy for yourself or your baby, crafts, jewelry, interior decorations, and even clothes and accessories.
Imagine a couple of "sheared" fluffy sheep on your mantelpiece, a small photo frame on the wall, a colourful necklace that will look great with your new dress, or unique home slippers that no one else will have...
Bring your ideas to life, "smashing" this wonderful wool!
Maria Kartazova, what does that mean?
I don't voice my thoughts, I mentally curse you all.
I mentally decapitate everyone who has gotten in my way, I mentally dump them into a dumpster and burn all the cars that are in my way, I mentally do it all!
And I can even smile at you.
But I remember that the thought was material!
Peter, the Second, did not sign a single death sentence during his reign.
Even the likes of Koba and his gang.
And bloody Sunday is a fabrication of the Bolsheviks.
Mattress Comfort Line Hard Classic TFK 180x190.
The mattress is hard on both sides.
Natural latex coconut coir does not cause allergic reactions and adds the necessary firmness and elasticity to the mattress.
The independent TFK spring block (512 springs per sleeping place) provides unique comfort and correct support of the spine during sleep.
A 200g can of jackfruit, drained
The hall provides protection and comfort.
Maximum load per sleeping place: 130 kg.
My horse.
A dollhouse with accessories, 6 pieces.
The charming pony lives in a cosy, fold-up pink cottage.
If you open the roof, you can install a kitchen in one of its halves, and in the other half you can set up a dining table, arranging the food for the guests on it.
The pony has big eyes, its mane and tail can be brushed with a comb.
The set includes: a 9 cm pot, a comb, a house (2 halves), a built-in table (2 pieces), a kitchen (2 pieces), accessories: scissors (2 pieces), a cake with a heart (2 pieces), a juice bottle, 2 glasses, a teapot, a cup and a plate.
MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS 90x190x27, weight 27.9 kg.
Alternating layers of latex and hard coconut coir give the effect of improved body support.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS mattress can withstand a load of up to 170 kg per sleeping place.
However, there is no wave effect: the couples lying next to each other do not move towards each other regardless of the difference in weight.
The materials used to make the model have been rigorously tested for quality.
They don't rust, they don't corrode, and they don't absorb odours.
A unique microclimate is created thanks to the full circulation of the air, which contributes to healthy rest.
High-strength thermal glue was used to bond the parts.
Sokurov's film gets European "Oscar" for best editing
The Russian film "Holding Hands" nominated for an Oscar won the European Film Academy Award (also known as the European "Oscars") in the "Best Editing" category, Moskovsky Komsomolets reports.
The competition jury, voting online due to the complicated epidemiological situation, assessed the outstanding skill of the film's creators.
The maximum number of awards went to the film by Jasmila Žbanić (Bosnia) "Where Are You, Aida?"
The main character of the film is a translator on a U.N. mission trying to save her family during the war in Yugoslavia.
As for the drama "Holding Hands," directed by Kira Kovalenko (a graduate of the Alexander Sokurov workshop), this film tells about the complex relationship between a domineering father and adult children who want to break free from their father's guardianship in North Ossetia.
Previously, it was announced that the film was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film.
As regular friendly meetings of the presidents of Russia, Azerbaijan and Turkey show, you, in my opinion, are not in the right place.
Only yesterday, the President of Azerbaijan approved the opening of a joint Azerbaijani-Russian KAMAZ plant.
